Good rant, stop looking for a mass movement, if one appears fine, but first change yourself. While at 54 still a work in process, I am a vegetarian (see corporate tainted food ect.) I shop at farmers markets, small shops and co-ops (member owned) I live in a urban space for two of 900 sq ft. I ride a bike and take MTA. I bank at a Federal Credit Union (small, local, member owned. Most importantly, I choose to live simply. As example . . . Go to a corporate drug store (the checkout girl has no health or retirement  and has to stock shelves and sweep floors for minimum wage or less if the corporation could, and is concerned abouting chatting about the community becouse of the boss.) or ride a mile to an owner run drug store (she welcome me by name, asks about my family and work or the community. She provides health and retirement for her workers.) Every day and every doller I spend I make a chooise and incurage others to do the same. Do you still bank at B of A or Chase? Why? Eat at Mc Ds or BK ? Why? What corporate policys are you supporting in Washingtion by funding them? If the policys are against your values the thousands of dollers votes out waigh your one electoral vote. Who is funding the Corporate lobbiest pushing the loophole in the tax bill? Be a Citizen or s Consumer. Working with others that may not see the world the same is a sign of adulthood wether at work or the community could this be why it is getting harder to solve problems?  
Sounds good to me.
Ok so people can donate charity, but how does people playing a video game come into the equation?
Why so red?
I don't really want to give away my relative anonymity. Let's just say it's in the top 10 and it's fucking cold right now. I did my undergrad at a big private university in Mathematics (picked up an Econ major on the way too) and had a 4.0 in major. If you're thinking about applying, my advice is to get some research done in undergrad, that is **the** major thing that gets you past an adcom and into a program.
At my school, it depends on the paper. Important ones require that the sources not be internet pages (barring scholarly databases like jstor). However, minor assignments/projects generally allow any source but wikipedia.
Are they?  I know there have been recent fights over what constitutes unreasonable searches at airports.  Sending a dog around sniffing for drugs goes beyond keeping the plane safe and is more like regular law enforcement.
I'll add my voice. I don't believe it should be illegal. I think if a person has been found with it, they should be answerable to where they got it; but I don't believe possession of it should incriminate them as being complicit in creation of child pornography. The argument of supply and demand is a tenuous one when we consider the creation of it would still be highly illegal with steep penalties.
Now all we have to worry about is 2012.
[George Carlin said it's not his sappy load of shit.](http://georgecarlin.com/home/dontblame.html)  Edit: Original quote pertained to a different forward. Here's the link to [snopes](http://www.snopes.com/glurge/aging.asp) where I got the info.
No, it's not like that. He's selling a reverse chronology not a reverse of physics.
Was sad about her.  I shouldn't have been. kousi from reddit dumb dumb dumb, everyone else: smart.
I didn't realize 'assclown' could be feminine, although I guess I never really thought about it before...
Don't be so sure she wants you back. My girlfriend and I broke up last summer and she contacted me recently saying that she wanted to catch up. There were little clues I tried to piece together, and I basically convinced myself that she wanted me back. We hadn't talked in months, and I figured she wouldn't break the silence unless it was for a good reason. I was wrong. She wanted nothing more than friendship. And all that time I had spent "getting over her" during the previous months had been wasted, because I had prepared myself that she wanted me again.  Maybe it's been long enough for you that hoping she wants you back won't send you into a tailspin if it turns out she doesn't. Maybe she does. I honestly don't know. But I'm sharing my experience with something like this, and sometimes they really do just want to catch up as friends.
That cat does not consider the dog before him, but instead realizes the Truth.
I just hate uninformed rhetoric...it makes me so tired. But politics doesn't sleep, or rest - but just occasionally I have to take a break from it all. I just hope that Democrats are smart enough to realize what is at stake. We can be critical - but we can't lose this edge to the other side. Obama and his administration are like Olympian gods compared to the double-dealing, jingoistic jargon loving bullshit of the neocons and the wingnut fundies...
No, but he found the sack in my pocket. :(
Feds take the fall in the first round.
Me to, omgomgomgomg
i just moved quite a bit away, so it doesn't happen nearly often enough now. ah well, i like the image ;)
so no one gives you a hard time, rolling into work fresh off one
Sounds good to me!
Scrutinizing Republican dogma is why i love The Daily Show
Read Revelation. This deity is one you are alreay familiar with.
Never thought they were fiction, but never heard of them until maybe 5 years ago, when I saw them on a nature show spearing through ice patches and had my mind blown.
No just as a hobby. The Koopa was pretty time consuming but if the price was right, and the person was patient then of course.
The real question is how many bytes to get to the center of a gilalizard?
Well, hopefully the fourth generation will see the 3rd's loss. Life is cycles.
City and Colour   Some of my favorites:   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iN0LY65KmAM   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=btjhdHX8pMo   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v6RJOpqPD1k (Gotta give this one until about 40 seconds in)   He's great, mellow, and overall I find him very relaxing. :)
I'm thinking more of [this cartoon](http://www.nogw.com/images/9-11_miracle.jpg) :)
So we're finding this is way more common than I thought! I'm not alone!
12th
Holy Christ yes. 
The original was written by a minister who intentionally left "God" out of it so there would be no conflating patriotism with theology.  "Under God" should be yanked back out.
If you read r/circlejerk forwards, it's about getting off
Remembering and reciting how to count backwards then badly messing up the lyrics to auld lang syne. Whoopie!
I'm hoping for Modern Warfare 2... COD4 is fun, I'd like to play MW2, but I'm not paying $60. Unfortunately, considering that its still in the top 5 without being discounted at all, I doubt we'll see it.
9th
the tl;dr is there to summarize the whole thing, so we DO know what it's about...  maybe you missed that concept..?  edit:  Also, I think people should put these at the TOP of posts instead of the bottom.. 90% of the time I read the whole thing and see the tl;dr at the bottom and think "fuck... I just wasted 5-10min"  most of the time I'm just interested in the general idea of the story and more often than not I don't bother to comment.
He thinks this is the promised land but he is really in Babylon.
My phone number at home used to belong to a doctor's office.  How do I know this?  Old people call.  A lot.  We tell them it isn't a doctor's office.  They call back.  We tell them it isn't a doctor's office.  They call back.  We tell them it isn't a doctor's office.  They call back.  We don't answer.  The answering machine says, "You've reached the Jones' residence, please leave a message and we might get back to you."  They leave a message for one of the doctors.  We bought this house about 4 months ago and have had the number almost the entire time.  The calls have just now finally started to slow down.
Not to mention that if you hire pornstars and film it, it is legal.
Whatever helps you sleep at night, buddy.
No money for maintenance along the way tends to add up to disaster all at once.
Can't it be both?
I'm not sure that's it.  A drive to succeed is just the drive to live, and it's a cellular thing. I think we have become overpopulated and willing to just say, "what the hell, I don't care what you do , just leave me alone."  The "powers" didn't do that. Our tolerance of horror is atrophied by what we see around us every day, we are becoming a planet full of sociopaths, and bobllama is right about us not caring. We don't.
I've built my own computer which dual-boots Kubuntu and Windows 7.  I also have a Mac laptop because when I'm giving presentations somewhere, I don't need to be ideological about my operating system -- I want it to work, without compatibility problems.  OS X gives me that.  I don't care how 'cool' it makes me.  I appreciate that OS X has a fully functional UNIX terminal I can use, too, and therefore gives me almost as much freedom as Kubuntu, and leagues more than Windows 7.
I apologise... Will try better next time! :)
You know some times one reads a "Top 20" list and sees a few movies that the person doesn't agree with but thinks the author is entitled to his views?? That's what I thought when Ebert included Juno in this list.  But, when he included Minority Report, I think he is off his meds or has taken too many of his meds or something like that..
Well, I suppose this _is_ the safest place on the internets to admit this...
I trust the Bible.  I know science.  It's not the same thing, really.
what's funny is how worthless these peoples lives will feel 30 years from now when marijuana is fully legalized.  sucks to be them.
Buy, buy, buy bozarking.
Lets just both hope that we are not put in a situation where we need to worry about things like that.
I dream in Rainbow Six. First person unless I'm in cover.
It is proportional to e-peen size
So, it's not even bound by a court order?  It's just a recommendation for him then.
How often do you deal with patient's nightmares?  Have you ever had patients with chronic nightmares?  How do you treat such a condition?
You'd probably have to pay more under your scheme than you currently do now, because you've been misled about the point of socialised health care.  Socialised health care is provided at a loss (i.e. it's free to the ill) because it benefits the whole of society - for instance, it stops poor people walking around and spreading the plague, or cholera   Both of those diseases scythed through London, killing hundreds of thousands.   They don't want to see that again. There's no benefit for British doctors to cure Americans of the plague, or syphillis, or whatever.  It would be a huge drain on the budget, without benefiting the British at all. And I bet you thought the NHS was free because the Brits were a bunch of huggy hippies who wuv everyone :) [Edited for clarity]
I was thinking that too. Then I figured I must be wrong because no one else had said it.
I even remember my dad buying a gas lantern that said "Y2K Compliant".
Size Acceptance Movement -- it works both ways. A marathon or ultra runner could easily qualify as POW. It's usually family or society at large that keeps someone from continuing with what feels right, and putting some "brakes" on the situation.
The Department of Homeland Security was created so that massive terrorist attacks killing thousands of Americans would be reduced to crappy terrorist attacks resulting in terrorists setting their pants on fire.  Seems to be working pretty well.
http://twmfcorp.com/random/com.youbroughther.gkcd.apk
W....what?
Sure doom fit on floppies....6 of them!
just figured out it plays only a preview. i'll get a link together tomorrow and pm you
... no culture? It's only because America has become a cultural hegemon and their influences permeated through various cultures that people don't think there is an American culture. But there is.
"Not everybody likes metal.   FUCK. THEM!"  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-Pmv__3krFw
Knowing LOST, no matter how many theories we come up with, it will still be something completely unexpected
trolled
If it makes you feel better, I think you're insane.  A username like "Killfuck_Soulshitter" doesn't help, either.
Never dreamt in anything else but first person...and you dream in the second, or third?
I'm surprised this hasn't happened anywhere yet. Or maybe our jerky news stations choose not to report when this happens.  
I somehow doubt that Czechs are very concerned with the imperial system of measure.
It's... confusing.
those are some fine lookin' west coast boys. yumm.
I came here to say this, but you beat me too it
But that's one of the basic moves of reddit-fu!
How many people grab for their phone whenever *anyone's* phone goes off because they keep their phone on vibrate so much they don't know what their ring sounds like?
Wait...what is going o--ALL GLORY TO THE HYPNOTOAD!
Cardinals fan?
Well there's your problem. The high E should be your first string, not your third.
So all men's brains have been altered because some men look at porn?   [citation needed]   I showed you mine, now show me yours
grow up my man
Way to be creepers.
Every parent has to make compromises, even the wackos
Bah, this makes me sad because I watch my room mate go through it all the time.
Ehh, it's scifi, but it's sort of fantasy too, in my opinion.
only luke cage's skin is unbreakable.  he is also strong.
windows 7 is far better than XP.  Take this from a guy who has used XP since it was released and skipped vista entirely.  Windows 7 is easier to use in terms of initial setup for sure and seems to run faster than any XP install ever did. 
DISREGARD THAT, I SUCK COCKS
America has had some of the greatest novelists of the 20th century. They do have a culture.
If by loud music you mean a mixture of alcohol and ecstasy, then yes.
WTF?  I was intending to be a little humorous.  You are way too tightly wound, and I suspect you might find the WSJ editorial page, or Human Events more to your liking.  Also,  fuck off and die and have a happy new year!
Cool. if I remember the last dispute someone had with Time Warner(I think it was our local NBC affiliate) TW gave us Showtime or HBO on that channel till it came back.
tl;dr: *you have to work at it to understand the calculus*  Or anything worthwhile, for that matter.   I do not disagree.
You can press the down arrow and "view them from the back"
yeah even my mom can understand the join() version
They should have let the fucker keep pouring coffee over his head for a really long time.
Moulin Rouge!
They're all pretty, pretty mad over there in Eastern Europe.
What are you trying to say?
The internet routes around censorship.  You won't miss an episode -- it's all online already.  You're watching buggy-whip manufacturers argue about the pony-express contract.   
yeah, i was thinking that when he said "40% of the information". please tell me there's more of us
I saw that wink.
It's incredibly interesting.
That is an awesome idea!
To my knowledge, they're trained to sniff contraband in general.  They even have ones that'll sniff media (film and CDs).  The only ones i think that are trained for one kind of sniff are corpse dogs.   Disclaimer:  i'm just a guy on the internet, i dont know jack.
I believe so.
No.  When I met Karl, he was with both his wife and his mistress (who seemed okay with each other).  I'm assuming he left his wife for said mistress, or perhaps a new mistress.  I don't think he'd have had a boyfriend AND a girlfriend on the side -- my gaydar wasn't tripped at all, he seemed very happy with his women.
Running "python -m SimpleHTTPServer" at the command-line will start an HTTP server on port 8000 that will serve the files in the current directory. Very useful for quickly transferring a file from one computer to another when you don't have a SSH or FTP server running.
Yes, ever since I got into reddit I've started momentarily wanting to upvote some comments on LiveJournal, even though I'd been using LiveJournal for years before reddit existed.  On the other hand, I also keep feeling the lack of some LJ features here on reddit.  It feels strange that I can't get my comments and replies to them emailed to me, for example.
3rd
1st.
I shot at a little scrap of paper floating in the wind thinking it was a guy, the shooting revealed my location on radar, and the real trollface shoots me.
11
Brucie?
It is not in the best interest of the child to be put into foster care...it is to stay with the grandparents.  If that means that the grandparents get fined, or if the HOA takes the house, oh well.
The guys who make the stuff in the jungle only have access to water, fifty gallon drums, and gasoline. I'm sure that with the equipment available to a scientific redditor a person could pretty easily do an a/b extraction or clean it up any number of other ways and end up with a product actually purer than the original uncut stuff. just google it
Pork and Sauerkraut
Thank you for this commentary, and the perspective of someone who lived in Nicaragua at the time this happened.  It is not overly dramatic at all to say this man should be celebrated more than he is.
Whoa brotha, take it easy. Everyone makes the mistake you made, as everyone was an outsider at one point; I'm just trying to help get you up to speed before you embarrass yourself in front of a bunch of elitists by calling house "trance."  Thanks for the grammar lesson; I'll never make that mistake again. "Conjunction junction, what's your function? Hooking up words and phrases and clauses!"  Also, fuck trance. "Also" isn't a conjunction is it?
Although you're not totally off-base, it is incorrect to say that "no one" can tell you what being American means. America, as a nation of immigrants, must look not to ethnicity or shared culture to find it's foundation, but values. Those who are particularly conservative and have a problem with using the word "values" in this context may replace it with universal truths.   The way in which we "value" the varying universal truths differ, but a vast majority of the country does indeed hold to these truths. Liberty, equality, democracy, justice, these are what America must base itself off of for lack of a common ethnicity. Even your statement of saying we're too individualistic comes back to this point, our individualism is a result of these shared truths, and our individualism itself results in the varying degrees of values we place on the universal truths, or in rare cases the outright rejection of said truths/values.
Since I'm so week at inference, what are you then? Or what do you believe?
it clearly didn't happen
Take a dump.
Venice breaks it :(
Sounds like someone has access to all the LSD they can handle.
 fibonacci = lambda x:map(lambda o:(map(lambda c:map(lambda l:o.__setslice__(l[0],l[1],l[2]),([o[2]+3,o[2]+4,[o[0]]],[0,3,[o[1],reduce(lambda x,o:x+o,o[:2]),o[2]+1]])),range(x)),o) [1],[[1,1,0]+range(x)])[0][3:]
Metal Gear Solid ringtone
Merry New Year! Beef Jerky Time!
I don't think you can definitively say her claim is bullshit.  She obviously did call the police when the robbery happened - if it was as easy as you say, why wouldn't the report have happened at that time?  Police officers are also capable of being lazy - perhaps they told her some bullshit so they could avoid the paperwork themselves? There's not really enough information here for you to denounce her as lazy just because you had a different experience with different police officers in a different location.
Uh no.  But thanks for playing.  When you really want help and not a handout perhaps there will be someone left to give you a break.  Whatever you do, don't ask me.  Jackass.
He missed that day in Smuggling 100
A lot of my friends have BlackBerry Pearls, and when we are around eachother... it can be a pain if your phone isn't in your pocket.
Nah I wasn't stupid enough to do that but they found out anyway and I ended up homeless for a summer until my gf's mom got tired of wondering if her daughter was safe (because my gf wouldn't leave me by myself) and gave me a 170 bucks to get a room that I rented weekly for three years (with my own money. I got a shitty retail job.) Currently my family is more used to it and we get along but I suspect things would be different if I was dating anyone. I haven't dated in two years because of health problems. Now and then somebody in the family will make a snarky remark about my atheism and I usually resist making snarky remarks back. My being gay though is totally a taboo subject that is NEVER talked about even though everybody knows.   Um ... so that's my life story. Enjoy. 
You must be good at riddles.
Seconded.
Oops, fixed, I hope. :-) 
If anyone is interested, [here is the NPR interview](http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=121983246).  It mentions the "well dressed man", but not the ["man in orange"](http://www.mlive.com/news/detroit/index.ssf/2009/12/flight_253_passenger_kurt_hask.html).
They also have excellent drone/chill stations for studying.  A big help during finals.
[The extended edition](http://i.imgur.com/5ctp7.jpg)
Rubbing Alcohol + Ziplock Salt optional. Shake like hell while watching t.v. etc. Rinse with water.
DISREGARD THAT, I SUCK COCKS
Seriously? What a stupid idea. China tried this for a while and it nearly fucked their entire country up. Turns out a declining population is worse for an economy than an overpopulated one. They should stick with a steady population policy: 1 couple, 2 kids. That way they can take plenty of time to un-gear their economy from a continuously growing one to a steady one. From there it will be much easier to downsize their economy and population if need-be. 
He was coming from [the Netherlands](http://yesweareonmars.files.wordpress.com/2009/02/dtuch-fans1.jpg).
My PC has a card reader in the floppy slot.  If I went to school there I'd be fucked.
A fella could have a pretty good weekend in Vegas with all that...
Just reading the headline I would imagine that he was so out of shape he couldn't run away. Right? Right?!
The key is empathy, and that is in short supply in the United States these days.  We have to care about the other; the other person, the other culture or race, the other species, the other environments we don't live in.  Our capacity for empathy is what makes humanity so different from the majority of the animal kingdom.  It can unite us in social structures of mutual compassion.  This is easy to see at the local level, in tribes, churches, and in our communities.  We have to expand our application of empathy to the entire planet.  Its the only way we will be compelled to take responsibility for what is done to the other, and in doing so take responsibility for our collective selves. We are at a crossroads in human development.  I only see two basic structures that could unite the world in a long lasting civilization.  Either we take responsibility for ourselves by caring for the other, or a tyrannical hierarchy of control will take that responsibility by preventing us from hurting the other.  Short of either one, our current form of civilization will expire once the resources become too scarce for our infinite growth.
Wow, I really like this photo. Thanks for posting it!
"while in June a snake bit a cleaner at the Myer department store in Lonsdale Street, Melbourne."  wtf? 
you may find this interesting:  http://www.reddit.com/r/cannabis/comments/a41z9/build_a_stealth_grow_box_for_less_than_150/
Yeah, I realize that's a likely possibility. I figure that I won't be losing anything, and while I wouldn't say I'm "over" her, it's not going to kill me if what I want isn't what she wants. She just surprised me by asking to get together. I had dropped several obvious (to me) hints that I was interested but I figured she wasn't.
http://imgur.com/Tcd1t.jpg
i thought it was the art of slow reading.
I happen to have a 1998 NYC travel guide handy.  ESB was actually $6 in '98, while WTC was $10.  After 9/11, ESB probably raised their prices since they were the only observation deck left.  Then in 2005, Top of the Rock opened as a competitor with a higher price than the ESB, so they probably raised it to match that.
This video is good enough for itself.  Though i loved Muse, your humble attempt fail.
Here's a more disturbing idea: someone on-board or on the ground jams the pilots' signal and convinces ground crews that it's been taken over by terrorists.  Authorities get so worried they shoot the plane down.
We are brain washed by the American Dream that has been shoved down our throats are entire lives.  Problem is, the American Dream no longer exists.  But the government keeps telling us it does.  "Keep spending"  that is the American way. I understand that France's government it fucked, but at least the people stand up to them.  What do we do... NOTHING!  Complacency kills.  People are not happy.  They just don't know any better.  Intelligent knowledgeable people are not happy because they understand what is going on.  Stupid people are happy...  Mind fucked people are happy.  I don't understand what you are getting at on the Obama thing.  I am saying that they are the same.  Both parties make their decisions for the same reasons.  It's about taking care of big banks and big corporations.  Neither party cares about the people... oh wait yes they do, they both care for how much freedom that they keep taking away from us.
I did something like that this time.
How tall are you and what's your weight? 
Did you even look at the links?  Riverdaughter.com is anything but right-wing.  Moron.
&gt;Conservatives don't realize that what they fear most is change.  They most certainly realize this.  Hence their name: conservative.  From the verb, to conserve.  To maintain the status quo.  Etc.
The fark tag is vestigial from the 2000 gore-bush election debacle.
Ah Scarker, I last saw you at the [Karma Party](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/ak483/last_wednesday_of_2009_karma_party/), where I took special notice because you were [repeating](http://i.imgur.com/vnRIF.png) the same comments over and over again in a karma grab. So perhaps my comment above is a little close to the bone for you. No biggie.   Happy new year, and enjoy the extra 1898+ points of karma :)
Good articles on foling poker tables
CoD 4 &gt; MW2
woah... haskell is invading the main reddit
I found reddit and digg the same day from my coworker in 2007. Used both for 6 months without a username. Then I signed up and used both for 6 months with a username.  After a year at digg I got sick of how much it sucked compared to reddit. Plus there was no reason to go to both... So I stuck with reddit mostly because the actual community was much better.
Larry
does anybody understand this title?
This happened to me before. Get some fine sandpaper and sand that sucka down a bit.
Thanks.  Good luck getting acquainted with reality.
How is it that we don't benefit from economies of scale in this case?  It would certainly cost more in total dollars, but I would think that overall it would be cheaper per traveler.  Regardless, it *will* raise ticket prices.  I don't think there's any way around that.
Yeah, I came to ask this. It seems to be happening more and more recently; have a mediocre idea, stick it online and ask for donations. It's starting to suck because it means when someone does something genuinely impressive they won't *get* anything. It's lame.   Edit: To clarify: getting donations is fine, a single small link somewhere for those who want to donate, but asking for them repeatedly across the website so we can't miss it? Lame. 
It would seem to help. Oh, did you hear that the crime rate was lower this year in Des Moines than in 2008?
Comments like that are the embodiment of what you just criticized in your post...
Nicely done!
Nope, but I share a birthday with Henry Kissinger.
Nice.....
There are other websites besides REDDIT?!?
Talking about my small penis is off topic. So don't go there buster.
That's not right.  As far as I'm concerned BrainwashedSociety2 was always the best BrainwashedSociety.  You're just a pale imposter.
I love that song, so great. Gulag Orkestar is an amazing album.
[Baader-Meinhof Phenomenon](http://www.damninteresting.com/the-baader-meinhof-phenomenon)
So if we don't like his art we're allowed to hate on him, what's your point?
How many hot dogs would you say you eat in a typical week? Just ballpark.
Methadone does not cost as much as a heroin habit. Not if we're talking about drug cost, societal costs, nor the cost of lives lost to overdoses or other complications of illicit heroin use.  Methadone is cheap, it's legal so patients aren't stealing to get it, and it's safe as far as overdoses go since it's given in known doses.
Happy New Year!!
Happy New Year citricsquid! ☼ ☼ ☼ \*fireworks\* ☼ ☼ ☼
i don't know why people think Rome is better, i prefer MII in just about every way.
Rumor has it that the stories in Girl Trouble, Holly Goddard Jones’ debut collection, are retellings of ancient Roman tragedies. Well, the evidence is certainly there. All the stories are set in or just outside of the fictional town of Roma, Kentucky, and several of them actually nod directly to Roman tragedy, as when a mother grieving the murder of her daughter likens her to Lavinia from Titus Andronicus. Other stories simply reference characters or ideas of the ancient world. But you don’t need to be up on your Roman mythology to fall under the spell of these dark, beautiful stories. All by themselves, and all allusions aside, the stories in Goddard Jones’ debut are, in a word, haunting. 
I'm staying in to finish college apps due the 1st.  Wish me luck!
This way he can have sex with his daughter when they're the same age!
is it bart-able?
I'll grant you that.
that was dreadful  3 minutes, i give up  what happens next?
The truth is much more interesting than your implication! I myself have never paid for sex.
apply the larry carlson filter
r/circlejerk
Eh, although understandable; my overt laziness has stopped me from making an account(I've been lurking for I'd say a good 2 years). Da well, no free handouts for me!
Is that what they say?  I can't believe I have been wrong all this time!
Happy New Year from England.
THANK YOU.
So I still have 22 hours to downvote any further comments he makes?
good luck!
It was all a tv show.
Or a speed/HP increase.  As it is now it is the lowest used unlock of all.
O I C :D
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vjhSp7xGsMc&amp;fmt=18 is the sole reason I bought an Xbox360, didn't like the game, which I should've expected but to this day, that and the Halo:ODST trailer are my favorites.  They know how to sell a product.
No no, this is perfect. 
Mine is to not babysit on the 31st of December, ever, ever again.
Man, you need to be more specific. There's at least dozens of different genres of 'most interesting' things which can happen to you, and picking an absolute is very much like the cliche of comparing apples and oranges. But if forced to pick an absolute, most people will surely select some event involving sex and/or love involving a particular person.
in-n-out has free pepperoncinis if you ask them for some, they hide them behind the counter
so 50mph+ is Mac or Linux?
90% of users would find linux completely useless for their needs. Average gamer: poor compatibility, confusing to set up wine, poor performance under emulation, poor graphic card support.  Casual users: too confusing, installing things is difficult, instructions for new hardware and software are only ever for windows, linux is not easy to use and does not have the same features they are used to.  There arent really that many people who see linux as useful, you manage to find quite a few of them on reddit, but the truth is that the market share is incredibly low for a reason.  The market for linux as it is is incredibly poor.
gotta take a screen shot dude. Tis already gone.
Couldn't find the specific numbers for the US, sorry for trying.
&gt;franken-penis   Couldn't contain laughter
And the market - which healthcare spending represents approximately 19% of our GDP - shouldn't be highjacked by greedy pirates... American spends disproportionately when you consider the number of people not covered compared to any other country in the world. The pricing structure was taken over by greed in the 1970's - with very little control. We need to wrest that control back again to what is reasonable. Healthcare is not like selling widgets or fancy cars - excessive profit should not be the goal.
Really? You're advocating intentionally false domestic violence reports? Have you ever been on the receiving end of one of these?
I do, especially if it's at my husband's expense. (Not monetary)
One of our favorite bars is in Allston, MA and has a room for darts that's almost as big as the main bar/seating area.  Awesome.
Well we are looking at new things to do, and new things to try. Its just that when you're riding the edge of financial ruin there are not the options you'd like. I'd love to go back to school and get retrained, but UI will only pay for one year of schooling, and they may actually not pay any benefits while you are in schoo. I had the Department of Reahbilitation willing to send me back to school, and they would pay for it, but not to help me live and pay bills. But because the course was 2 years UI was not willing to pay me benefits.  The sad thing is I have a fair amount of good ideas to make money, I just don't have any money to start it up with. So I am trying to do what I can. with what I have. I am not just sitting on my ass wishing things were better.
I should try it next year
Post is gone from CL...might as well delete this UNLESS...you were smart and did a screen grab!  Happy New Year!
Rush Limbaugh is a psychopath who planned and led an attempted genocide of all intelligence.  If ever there was a charted plane that crashed on its way to the Douchebag Convention, I would hope it contained: Rush, Bill O'Reilly, Hannity, Ann Cunter, and most especially Glenn Beck.
I spend more time on reddit at work than I do at home. And I still get everything done that I need to accomplish.
The kind of adult who knows a 12 year old and how they act
One of mine did once. I still don't think it happened.
The Kilo WT version is actually designed for brakes / fenders.  Most of the Dutch bikes are jokes.  $800-$1200 for a 45lb high-ten steel bike?  Fail.
The only thing I can think of is if there were other terrorists on the plane and want Al Qaeda think they weren't captured.  However, I assume if they lost contact with them, they would assume they were captured. That's just me though.
am i back on digg? high handed action, keyser. 
I'm not sure if it will work for Macs. I own the PC version and heavily edited some of the game's .ini files.
It's huge man huge!
Shumpeter was not an Austrian School economist but, instead, a neoclassical economist *from* Austria.  Minsky's analysis is much like the Austrian Business Cycle Theory except that he argues credit expansion and increases in the quantity of money are inherent in a capitalistic system whereas Austrian argue that they can exist in such a system, but that a central bank, system of fractional reserve banking, or both, all of which require government intervention, are necessary for the boom and the subsequent bust to occur.
stop sperming near her
Joe Pesci seems like a guy who can get things done. In fact, Joe Pesci came through on a couple of things God was having trouble with.
in case you forget the broken plate... http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/acfr5/a_plate_broke_i_dont_know_how_to_pick_it_up/
Why is that conservatives vigorously defend Blackwater? This would seem to me to be an issue that transcends party lines. Privatizing the military is a bad idea. I can't imagine that even libertarians would appreciate a privatized army as it's a very clear case of a conflict of interest.
Blue... you are being such a douche by harping on and on. He's got two accounts, and he says Next a lot. Both of you are typical internet cock swingers now. 
I just found the [Samsung Galaxy](http://www.samsung.com/ca/consumer/mobile/mobile-phones/all-phones/GT-I7500OKBBMC/index.idx?pagetype=prd_detail) but it is pretty expensive especially considering I probably won't use the phone functions.
Like puff puff pass?
Does this help?  http://www.quransearch.com/sami_zaatri/law_of_apostacy_in_the_bible.htm
This post is fucking stupid.  
I was supposed to see Gogol Bordello for my second time ever on Monday, and I ended up getting into an argument about the bouncer since I forgot my ID (It was an 18+ show! I've never needed ID for 18+!) and didn't get in...I've been upset since.
I think it is considered third.  The best way to describe it is a third person shooter type view.
Relapse is decent imo.
That is an excellent plan. May I join you?
so 3 or 4 months?
How's my stock in Skynet doing?
Same here. It pisses me off when I can feel the hair on my legs. I shave armpits, crotch and legs daily.
Explained: This is the quality of life asian immigrants will be bringing to america.
They are announcing alien life.
oh god, reading Gibbon on new years?? Bless you child
Has to be at me unless we're talking a really low volume gig. They really don't get that loud, but work fine as monitors. 
What is neuroeconomics?
I'll give you Dinosaur Jr., and I'm not even a big fan of Social D myself, but to claim they shouldn't be lumped into the genre is just asinine.   &gt;Social Distortion (sometimes referred to simply as Social D or SxDx) is an American punk rock band formed in 1978 in Fullerton, California.[2] The band currently consists of Mike Ness (vocals, guitars), Jonny Wickersham (guitars), Brent Harding (bass) and Adam "Atom" Willard (drums). **They are often credited as one of the leading bands of the 1980s hardcore punk explosion.**   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Social_Distortion
Isn't this from Seinfeld?
Fake.  The one on the right has a beard in the second picture but not the first.
Poor? Club-Bar hater? Well then, come out to Atlanta Brewing company for $20 all you can drink fantastic beer* and or'dervs** plus me and some friends!  Basically I'm poor this holiday season, turned down a lot of friends that were hitting up obnoxious house parties and bars/clubs.. decided this would be a lot smoother and easier (and cheaper). (* in my opinion) (** oh I can't spell, and too lazy to look up.)
Aha! Thank you, that's what I figured but I wasn't sure.  (btw, I'm a girl if that takes some of the creepiness out of my curiosity)
I went through this very decision making process a few years ago. Considered the landfill waste of condoms and the impact of birth control pills on ocean/fish populations, so I switched to an IUD (as my husband and I were not ready to go under the knife). 2 years, healthy and happy with my decision. No babies, less impact. Go team safe-sex!
I had to make it myself so if you have an iPhone the one I made loops perfectly at 26.746s ripped from the OST.  I also have keyboard cat, keyboard cat 8-bit version that I had to make myself... some other good ones John Travolta from South Park hysterically "Is this where L Ron Hubbard is? Oh m'Gah!" etc.  Funny in a quiet store, or if it interrupts someone talking-- they want to be angry but can't because they're laughing.  Also some great NES Metroid sounds-- my typing sound is Samus dropping plasma bombs.  Unlock is new rockets.  New email is new-item fanfare-- all the sound-levels adjusted to match and not be too loud.  I can send them-- I just offer because there was no place for me to download them- there was some legwork involved.
I was 12 and playing Quake 3! It was fun to do the countdown with the in-game chat.
probably touch myself
I've had this after moving up a stake too. You have to accept that you're not playing *that* well. At NL10 if your EV BB/100 is more than about 10 it's very likely that you've just been lucky, either in the cards you've got or in drawing out before you're all in.  That's happened to me when I've moved up a stake. Actually so has the opposite: getting really unlucky and I thought I played bad, but 10,000 hands later I can say I was just unlucky: all-in-wise, opponent-wise, card-wise.  **TL;DR:** That's mostly luck and a correspondingly big downswing is coming.
Whats the problem? Babies can swim (really).
interesting solution. what about searching in it? you create an index or just grep the folder?
scotch
Dude! You drew this guy on a a rorb-raptor! http://imgur.com/tpXEp.jpg
&gt;Girls are taught not to compromise their femininity regardless of what they are interested in doing.  So we're supposed to fight like hell, against our own financial self-interest, to change some social mores, but accept others as insurmountable obstacles that we must work around?  Silly.   Why doesn't PZ Meyers criticize little girls for buying pink microscopes, instead of toymakers for not releasing the most powerful model in pink (the less powerful ones are available in black, so that's what we're really talking about here)?  I'll tell you why. Because PZ Meyers is as much a victim of conditioned, biased, unscientific thinking as the people he often rails against. The fact that he is most often right is an accident. He may be indoctrinated to a more accurate worldview, but he's still indoctrinated.   Corporate entities are automatically the enemy. Little girls are automatically blameless victims. Parents of little girls are automatically well-meaning, but misguided.   Scientists are generally only scientific about their specialty. Outside that, they rarely if ever apply their disciplines of thought to the conclusions they form.   PZ Meyers has no idea how many microscopes are bought by/for little girls, of what power, in what colour, and how this compares to the numbers for little boys. And not knowing the *what*, he *certainly* has no idea of the why.   And yet, he has formed a clear opinion that something is wrong, that he knows what it is, and that he knows who is to blame.   He would not *dream* of leaping to conclusions in this fashion in biology, a field where he is a qualified expert. But he does so in psychology and sociology, fields where he is not.   It seems that the more ignorant someone is, the more cocksure they become. 
More Lies and Disinformation brought to you by the Propaganda Ministry
In about a months time you'll have one
just added it to my vocabulary!
If you're never given 'morals' and you learn from the ground up I would expect that you create some sort of 'self-awareness'.  Then your morals would be based on protecting yourself.  If all you know is to protect yourself than murder doesn't seem 'wrong', so long as you're fine then what's the matter?
Here we go...
♫They stop cthulu eating ye...♫
I'm jealous, it must be fun to be able to enjoy scary games like that.
My freshmen year in college a met a pretty cute blonde chick who lived 2 floors below me (in a big freshmen dorm) and was trying to hook up with her.  Things were going well, and I was anticipating getting my dick wet, but this brunette chick who was hanging out with us kept hitting on me hardcore.  She wasn't bad looking, but definitely not as hot as the one I was trying to hook up with.  The only problem was since this girl kept flirting with me (while I was kind of trying to ignore her) the hot chick started backing off.  It turns out it was her sister who was visiting from high school (and she was 17...oops).  So the hot sister, seeing her little not as pretty sister wanted me, basically stop flirting with me.  By then I was pretty drunk and kind of pissed, and I decided that I'm getting my dick wet one way or the other.  So I let the sister blow me (she was really good, incidentally, and swallowed) and I bounced.  I still see the hot sister around school sometimes, and one time we started flirting again, but she said "I like you, but if you think you're getting with both of the (her last name) sisters, don't get your hopes up."  So that was that.  But anyway, I have an awesome gf now, so I'm happy :)
I try to maintain a forgiving and tolerant disposition, but you sir (or madam) have committed heresy against more things that I hold dear than I have cheeks left to turn.  (Yes, it's sad but true that I have a cheekless ass).
i think it's a bit naive to try and dismiss a large part of a population as incapable of thinking, incapable of seeing grey in issues, etc.  or simply an underhanded argumentative tactic.  
Sweet!  I'm new here so that's good to know!
Another Indy redditor, I thought I was the only one!
Indeed. Note, though, that we can define  * moral relativism as "that which is morally right from a group is that which the group believes is morally right"; and * moral subjectivism as "that which is morally right for a person is that which the person believes is morally right."  They are related but different. It is hard to say which is worse but at least moral relativism has the ruse of sounding democratic and culturally sensitive.
Pooky
In Soviet Russia, snowman make you! I'm sorry, I just had to say it.
I showed you historical evidence.  Written pornography was primarily consumed by men for a very long time.  If visual pornography was really THAT hardwired, we would expect to see etchings of erotic acts being as popular as written erotic works in the 18th and 19th centuries.  They weren't.
Absolutely.  And ToyCamera in FxCamera looks really cool. 
Just moved to Florida this year when my husband got a job down here. I have lived in California, Washington, Tennessee, Texas, South Carolina, and Virginia before moving here. This IS the most backwards place ever. We bought a house in Delray Beach. The median age here is 74. We are in our early thirties and it took us 2 months to find the rare neighborhood we were old enough to live in. The age restricted community dominates here. We finally found a neighborhood that was safe AND that was not age restricted. It was one of two. Basically, in Delray Beach, you are either old or you live in the ghetto. I am anxiously awaiting the day we leave this hellhole.
Very true.
If you ever visit Boston, you must go to The Publick House in Brookline.
Don't.  But if you're set on the idea, I'd say go to a diner or something and get some good steak fries.  Please don't go to any fast food places.
They do a great live show also. He's very funny and personable:)
Batman kinda predates video games.
Newegg's daily deal does. 
Except you still get a fuckload of gold when you killed them so its cool anyways
*Our personalities are certainly not set in stone, however - no matter how old we are*  Thank you. I get very tired of the fixed personality argument. Human behaviour is much more contextual and flexible than that.
I respectfully disagree
They enforce an 80% market share now - I don't think that it's impossible to enforce a 5% increase.
Deal Blackjack If you would learn how to play and knew that I only make $5 per hour and tip me a few bucks before i leave the table. Thanks.
For future discussions: http://imgur.com/dBS8y.jpg
What?   &gt;hide deep within the GUI   You need to get a job writing for CSI.  Seriously, this is not egregious, look up what you are buying. Don't just assume what you are ever getting, and if you are getting a 200 dollar laptop then maybe this is what your getting if you want win7 on there.
If I were TW I would drop Fox "News" and instead air MSNBC on their channel for a few days. That would sure as hell motivate Fox to settle quickly.
Gategate
Do you have a high-pitched voice?
Yes, it is more or less beyond repair.  You can definitely clean it up a bit via photoshop, but most of the information on the faces was completely destroyed, so the only way to repair it would be to "paint" new detail in where no detail existed before.   What camera was it taken on?  Cell phone, or a small point and shoot?  And is that the original photo you posted, or a compressed/resized one?  If that's a resized/compressed photo and you have the original, it is possible there's some data that could be extracted.  It wouldn't fix everything, though, since part of the issue is motion blur/bad focusing.  It could help correct the overexposure though
Cream cheese and cranberry sauce - good with leftover turkey following the holidays. Makes a fantastical sandwich. 
I'm seeing both of them soon, you should come!
**tldr; School is boring and it needs to be fixed by making it relevant to our daily lives**  Hijacking an upper comment here--   &gt; I'd like to say the education system is to blame, but the reality of it is that people in the US have never really valued education. We did. A long time ago. Back when it was relevant.  &gt; We deride people who are academically-inclined or educated, we praise the "self-made man" who made something of himself without the need for formal training, we call them nerds, book-worms. My belief is that the anti-intellectualism stems from people not being entertained by what intellectuals think is "cool" -- like programming. They associate intellectuals with Shakespeare and Monet and wine tastings.  I believe that part of the reason the self-made man is respected is because they have skills that are relevant -now- and can make a difference... -now-.  To understand how we got to this point, I need to give a small history lesson. Back in the 1800s, when the American education system was first sprouting up, the most PRESTIGIOUS career you could possibly have is a priest. That's why you went to school. No other reason why anyone would go to school. That's why you went to college. Actually, that's why most old-old colleges have a religious affiliation. Now, back then the only thing that was important to analyze was the Bible.   And that was fine. If you wanted to become a priest. Then capitalism came in. Started saying, "Hey, school/college is for everyone. So we're not just having you study the Bible, we're having you study Shakespeare too." and that was fine. For the 1700s. When there were no cars and no railroads, and generally no reason to learn problem solving, engineering, marketing, sales, or writing.  While I love Shakespeare's writing and Claude Monet's painting, we should absolutely not be forcing that crap on our kids, masquerading it as "teaching analytical skills". What's more important? Learning to analyze Shakespeare, or learning to analyze modern social problems. Yes, I know, Shakespeare has some applications to modern social problems, no, I don't care. We've tried doing this shit the Shakespeare way since the 1700s. What's it done to the spirit and motivation of our students? It's crushed it. DOE performance audits (both internal and public) rate student motivation as it's lowest... ever.  My boss' original question is-- well, why is that? Here's the answer, and I'm right about this: it's because the stuff our students are learning is no longer relevant to their daily lives. At all.  Here's something I learned the other day that simply blew me away-- one of my favorite Counter-Strike maps was, in fact, built by a fourteen year old. This kid apparently taught himself how to use it using online tutorials, and then practiced and practiced until something good came out.   Now, if you can get a fourteen year-old kid to teach himself how to create a complicated map, while studying how gameplay flows inbetween the different areas, and successfully marketing it to a community, why isn't that kid being taught to do that in school? The CS thing is a perfect example, because it teaches marketing, analytics, critical thinking skills... all REALLY important. Yes, Shakespeare teaches critical thinking skills. I know. I don't care. Shakespeare is boring to *most* 14 year-old kids. CS is not.   &gt; No, we don't value education, we don't value culture, we rejected everything the "old world" taught us  Yep. But screw the old world.  &gt; threw the baby out with the bath-water, so now all we have left is an obscene culture of self-indulgence, self-gratification and self-obsession. Yeah, pretty much hit the nail on the head. We need the education system fixed.  My first paying job was a Senate policy analyst. I specialized in education.
Wait, wait... so TW is showing me how to pirate network television online because its in a pissing contest with a mega corporation?  &gt;Together, we can stand up to the TV networks – and hold down TV prices.  Sweet, sweet irony how doth thou taste.
Woot!  Too bad they're still making me keep Fox "News".
Let's go Rangers!
There are some people who believe that God created the universe and the framework around it, Isaac Newton is one of those.
If I had a son and I saw him getting paid to fuck the women I jerk off too it would be the proudest moment of my life.
This also works well for venting Farts.
Woah... Did they find a habitable planet *already?*  [Requisite wikipedia link.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kepler_Mission)
I'll definitely do some research on conditioning, and about your last answer, i've never really looked at it that way. I'd rather tell myself i pursued my dreams even if i fail, rather than knowing that i was too afraid to do what i wanted to do. That really helped. It's been bothering me for months and now i can finally see things in another perspective. So thank you and i wish you a happy New Year! By the way, I noticed reading your comment was the first thing i did in 2010.(well, the first thing i did was refreshing the browser and clicking on the orangered envelope, but that doesn't matter) Even though i'm home alone, i think that's a pretty good start for 2010.
Cheap wine, because I can't tell the difference.  Good beer, because I can.  Hot wings (marinating for a bit more)  Fresh baked apple pie (coming out of the oven in 40 minutes).
I've been wondering if it's possible to accomplish this effect using just CSS. Perhaps you could simply hide the down arrow and make the up arrow's graphic a tall pair of arrows.  Also, why currently have the downvote arrow visible but non functional for submissions but invisible altogether for comments? Either way is great, but it should be the same for both.
Yes, obviously Obama is to blame for a District Judge upholding the Fifth Amendment and dropping charges filed by the Department of Justice...
http://www.gnu.org/software/emacs/  It's one of the two most popular editors on Linux (the other one is Vim) and among programmers.
Because you're a faggot, alright!
You'll never make me cry (jane fonda in Cat Ballou) That and crying about anything, upsets me!
Gotta get a lawyer, even lawyers get a lawyer. They can get away with saying things you can't, without sounding disrespectful. Personal experience here, that's just how most judges operate. Statistically, those with lawyers get significantly better treatment from the "system." Sad, but true.
Have you ever been transported back in time nearly two millenia and had to rebuild your whole society without the benefit of modern technology?
CP girls are cute!
Get drunk.
RIP little guys.
14th
We have the culture of no culture. The Jeet Kune Do of culture, only way less cool.
I had a (male) roommate like this.  Nothing bugs me more than foreign hair in the shower.  So, when does she move out?
Assuming it's the basement in the building you live in and that building has less than four units, the Fair Housing Act probably doesn't apply to you.  You're free not to rent to families with children, African-Americans, or anyone else. However, just as restaurants can't refuse to serve black people, real landlords and realtors (the sort with lots of units, not just individuals with a spare room) are prohibited from discriminating on the basis of race, religion, national origin, family status, etc.
"Some things weren't explained to me so I'm jumping to ridiculous conclusions."
You think you could do what he does? Seriously?
It's not.
What game is it? Your standard deviation is so small! When are you going to move up a stake?
Yes.  I consider it the sign of a healthy imagination.  Just make sure you remember the conversations are imaginary and you're good.  Don't let them get in the way of your everyday practical reasoning either.
Oooh, Navy Seals!
In an embarrassing contretemps, it became self-aware and immediately started shorting itself.
&gt;Doesn't alter the case that my money is being taken at gunpoint, however.   Yes it does.  Your sentiment is useless hyperbole unless you can present photo, video or witness evidence that a gun was actually pointed at you by a federal agent who then demanded your money in order to finance our wars. &gt;If the founding fathers were alive today, they would be deeply ashamed of what America has become. You have absolutely zero proof of that because the people are long dead.  Stop trying to speak through them.  I skimmed your book and they came across as confused and inane ramblings of a half-crazed, libertarian conspiracy theorist.  Please try to offer more credibly sources for America's supposed constitutional crisis. &gt;Sounds like you need to travel more. I can name several, with Switzerland being at the top of my list.   Sound like you need to read more about the cultures of different people.  Switzerland is a very cramped country with mandatory military service and a somewhat anal-retentive population.  Even if I immigrated, it's unlikely I would be accepted as a full Swiss, even if I married a Swiss girl.  Please try again.
A few more:  * PdaNet, if you have a netbook or laptop, so you can access internet via EV-DO/3G without paying extra tethering fees * Barcode, which lets you add apps or contacts by scanning a specially formatted barcode * Skype, assuming you have Skype, because it's Skype. Also Meebo if you have IM accounts and you want to keep in contact. * Layar is cool as a demo of the phone, but useless.
I like how poe's law can apply to mac fanboys.
Yeah, Tycho is pretty solid. Compared to Boards of Canada a lot - watch out for BoC lovers, they can be pretty damn hostile when you bring up Tycho. :P
I just ordered it and while I am waiting for it to arrive I would like to see what fellow redditors think about it (if you own it or not). [Edit:] I have lurked reddit for a few months now but just recently have started submitting, and I am not sure how to include text with a link (despite using the text tab)
I think this is true of christian zionist tradition.  It is quite popular to blame the israel lobby but I have heard Israel described as a US military base also.   Perhaps all these 3 factors and more conspire to give us the current situation.
Some of their older stuff wasn't really my thing, but Evocation I (their latest album) is great.  Didn't know there was Swiss folk-metal either... you learn something new every day. :)
Sigh ..... *there is always one*
ditto
&gt;I don't understand why everyone is dropping him. All he did was bang a ton of chicks. Hell, if I was as famous as him I would too.  Most of us would.  The problem is, the public now associates him with infidelity, divorce, and domestic violence.  So how is AT&amp;T (or any company) supposed to put an ad on television with Tiger endorsing their product, knowing that the public isn't going to see the World's Greatest Golfer liking the product, but is going to see The Guy Who Cheated on His Wife a Gazillion Times and She Found Out and is Divorcing Him After Beating Him Up.  Things will probably come around for him, but right now, it doesn't make much business sense to keep paying him and not being able to use his celebrity.
I disagree.  This sort of scenario usually suggests a difference between what you want and what you need which is common for people with out much dating experience.  If you haven't dated for ten years you're probably deeply out of touch with what actually makes you happy in a relationship.  There are a lot of things that seem like they would make you happy... hotness, intelligence, liking the same bands etc... but these aren't the things that really make a relationship work.  I've dated some people rather reluctantly, which resulted in a change in the way I saw the person and some of my most satisfying relationships.  I want to qualify this and say that you should always treat people with respect and a reasonable amount of transparency.  For instance, if it's clear after a date or two that you don't see the other person as a long term potential, you have to make this clear to them.  Don't deceive them or give them inappropriate expectations.  If you tell people you're experimenting around to see what works for you, they'll be understanding.
When it's all you've ever known, it's not that bad, really. I still wish my mentula was intact, though. I'd much rather the choice to have been mine.
My apologies for misunderstanding. I agree user policing is better for KP's. 
The time period doesn't fit but there was a death by honey scene in Candyman 2
NWT from Ottawa? Expect culture shock...
What kills me is the "corporate welfare" the tens of millions we *give* to companies like Exxon to "promote American interests overseas"  - that has to stop.
But unoriginal.
To be fair, FSM always tips the scales in favor of the Pirates.
Dizi Sinema Komedi Eğlence Magazin Muzik Klip Radyo Tv Dahasi Www.Yurdumuz.Com Da İzlenir..
I was 26, a box office manager at a local theatre. I had to work the Lorie Line New Years Eve Barfstravaganza! (if you are local to minneapolis you probably have heard of Lorie Line, she plays piano and does these live holiday shows that attract the doubleknit clad sex starved suburban succubi in the area). I had to settle the show, which means that after it started I had to run a billion reports and pull together all the sales figures so everyone could cut checks to everyone else.  The first part of my evening was spent trying to explain to old ladies why row W was not closer to the stage than say, row G. Losing my shit at Lorie Line's husband for promising a bunch of people that he would get them into the completely sold out and already over capacity show. Slipping cash to my employees for the night so they would not feel so bad about having to work NYE.  And finally I got to leave at intermission and get home in time to get myself nicely sauced for the new year.
The crater created by Ivy Mike has a much bigger diameter.  That blew away an entire island.  http://wikimapia.org/1475842/Ivy-Mike-crater
Suddenly I'm glad I didn't go to any Wikipedia-editor's NYE parties.
Not even flying bicycles.  We were totally sold a bill of goods on that one as children.
I wish he had shown annualized rates.  400% over 10 years is only 17% annually.  Not that 17% inflation is low, but its much more useful for comparisons.
Why does it have to be a Homosexual thing?   Can't it just be a "Bro-Mance" like on inside the actors studio?  I wouldn't base what movies I enjoyed off the cameos and supporting acts of "PSH" either...I mean if he is so great maybe he should star in something noteworthy??
You know that the peyote cactus is going extinct thanks to people takeing buttons from plants? You should use san pedro cactus if you want to keep it alive.
8th
python -i myScript.py  - If there's an exception it allows you to work from the console.
A decade is ten years. It can be 1990 through 1999, it can be 1991 though 2000, it can be 1995 through 2004. The start of the next decade is whenever you want it to be. Since starting the current system at 1 AD is completely arbitrary, you can treat 1 BC the same as 0 AD if you want to have perfect groupings going back, but it doesn't mean anything. It makes much more sense to refer to the 90's as a decade from 1990 through 1999 than to have to explain "well technically, if we start counting at year 1..." It's just grouping so we can refer to sets of years more easily, and grouping how one would count (2000 being the start of a new millennium, 2010 the start of a new decade), regardless of whether we start at "0 AD" or "1 AD," since it's still a year that existed, is what makes sense.
When you buy land, in fee simple, the fewer the restrictions on how you can do with your land, the better.  The more easements, covenants, profits, HOA contracts, etc are on your land, the less autonomy you will have.  If you want to have a house that you don't have to take care of, and want everything to be the same, and don't want to worry about maintenance, rent a freakin house or apartment.  Otherwise buy it outright with no restrictions.
24th.
Hey. I'm awesome. *In the pants.*
Escort is a nice name for non-addict prostitute (mostly). That price is for quality control. If you want cheap go to a corner and find two skanks with the bug who do it without rubbers for 5bucks more and see how that works out for you.
Wikipedia is saying that the game has been entered in the Guinness World Records Book for both 2004 and 2008 for the most "expensive virtual world object ever sold" - So in addition to possibly making a profit, he may have just purchased his way into a Guinness entry.
People would still post them to get high up and downmods. It used to not have karma. 
Wooo-hooo... Paul Blart Mall Cop: #4 movie of 2009!!!
uh it was actually my first. we were just fondling about, clothed at some point she went down and went to business. at that moment, to me, that was *completely* unexpected.
&gt; Vigenere encryption in one line  can you demo that code ? [aint working for me](http://paste.pocoo.org/show/161007/)
i forgot about that!
Julie's claim of her not texting you seems probable. I was texting a friend once (bitching about an ex-girlfriend) and I get a message from some odd number from North Dakota. Some cellular networking magic had bounced my message to that person. No clue who they were... To have it happen so consistently seems like someone is being dumb. 
Is Omaha Tracker useful? How does it compare to Holdem Manager?
...what?
SMARCH
I thought he was one of Shakespeare's more predictable characters, although he could be a real dick at times.
I'm the EXACT same way. I can sleep any time, any place, for almost any length of time. And airplanes and cars are the *worst*. I fly probably ten or twelve times a year, and I'll be asleep (a) before takeoff and (b) after landing; ideally in a window seat, but I can make do elsewhere. I have no idea why, but I think it's partially because of the vibration/hum of the plane (like high-intensity white noise), and partially as a mechanism to deal with stress.   PS. I am not Asian, sadly.
quentin tarantino  seth rogen
WTF.  moo duk kwan
This link hijacked my browser, and wouldn't let me go back to Reddit. Now I am sad :(
Yeah, they seem to always kick me out or get me arrested. Something about being 'under 21' or some shit like that.
Spending it with my family in Mexico.  I should've done that this year.  Dang.
I think the ones about gods being a projection of ourselves or man creating God in his own image are fine hypotheses.  We can be pretty certain that Jesus was not white like he is often portrayed by many people who are white.  There is nothing wrong with these points and if you are offended you are being too sensitive.  Some of those comments are snarky and/or do not address the OP's question, but some of them are children comments that are not directed toward the OP and every thread in every subreddit has people posting harsh comments with little value.  That is what the downvote is for.  I think solid beliefs can handle the wolves without getting too stressed.   Ask yourself what it is about your beliefs that need to be protected from immature people on the internet?  Reddit has a good group of commenters that overall outweigh the crappier ones.  I say post your thoughts and beliefs, defend them, and downvote the people who do not add towards productive discourse.
*[Ba-dum-tsh](http://instantrimshot.com/)*
Shards streaming.
Katamari Damacy
"I think they should just clear off all the city....just take it off the ground....yes, I'm just a little bit facist."  I consider this the mainstream Israeli opinion.   Fuck 'em.
what lens did you use?
Thanks for your side on this.  I do have what I would certainly consider to be some "nice" LCD panels, so I appreciate gaining some perspective.  100lbs is probably a lot bigger than it sounds...the largest I've ever carried was 68lbs, and that was outrageous.
I don't think you actually know what that word means.
Done. The big banks now have 38 cents less to work with!
Is Omaha Tracker useful? How does it compare to Holdem Manager?
\|/   ಠ_ಠ
the median age here is too low. It isn't until you're about 30 that this starts to make sense. I quit caring what was on any of these three years ago.
True that.  I can't count all times i've typed :wq! to try to exit Word  ;-)
I agree, though IANAA. I have kids being day-cared next door all summer. I don't have kids or want any, but having kids around livens up the neighborhood in general. Sometimes too much, but overall a normal part of things IMO.
It's always retarded time when I'm around.
Thank you! It's my current computer background.
Ahh, that second one sounds right, he could see through the rocks to see the lizards sleeping.  I hadn't even thought of that til you said it, I thought the "lizards sleeping through rocks" was like the aliens from Buckaroo Banzai living inside the mountain in the 8th dimension, except these lizards *sleep* through the rocks, sort of like they have sleep-activated flux capacitors.  As long as they are asleep, they can phase right through rocks. I still like my way better, but yours makes more sense and is probably right.
Well, I think nearly every adult likes cocks in one form or another--albeit your own, affixed to a sexual partner, or a toy resembling its general shape and/or proportions.  In this respect, an appreciation of cock doesn't necessarily constitute membership into nerdom.
My dream would be to smoke marijuana with Christopher Hitchens. And talk about life. &lt;3
It's a metric for determining who's unemployed. 
You should put a camera in the shower, to catch her in the act!  Then post it on reddit.
Awww.  That's adorable.
My heart is going to love tonight then.  
I was in Guate and I have to agree with you 100%
I didnt say she was a liar.  I dont watch her show.  I do know she doesnt call out the numerous democrats and their shady deals.  So yeah, pussy out and back that shit up.  When does she or any of the other democrat liberals go after 'their own'.  They dont.  Just like the republican mouth pieces dont go after their own. Retard.
You know when Bill Clinton said that our diverse ethnic groups makes us a stronger country?  well, that's a lie.  Multiculturalism weakens a nation; it doesn't strengthen it.   When you add a bunch of different races into one country,  people don't unify,  they become divided.  You've been lied to.  I've been lied to.  My college professors fed me that multiculturalism bullshit too.   What happens in prison?   Each race chooses to eat with its own kind.   They form groups based on race.   That happens in the real world as well.  People tend to buy houses in neighborhoods where their race is predominant.  
We don't give a fuck because we are still reaping the rewards from our past successes.  Success breeds failure.  Some people call it decadence.
Old people, ruining society from social security onwards.
I love the Ikea block full of knives.  It costs under $10.  Wash them in the dishwasher, use them to cut drywall, whatever.  When they dull buy new ones.  Do this for 20 years and you are still ahead over a quality knife set.
Thanks. Had no idea what the OP was talking about.
[Papi](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=papi) [Mami](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=mami) Happy new year!
GROW UP, little fool.  That little moron thinks he can change something by lying to everybody. Good luck with that, fool.
I've played with people who didn't know it put out fires so when i put them out they got confused by it which is always amusing.  Same with snipers who don't know you can light arrows.
Get a first at university and smoke lots in the process, thus proving to myself that there is such a thing as a productive stoner.
I owned a 8$ HDMI cable and I needed to unplug and replug it to get the sound to work. Sometimes more expensive=better.  But seriously I buy 30$ cables and they're perfect. Stay away from both Monster and the cheap stuff. 
&gt;it would more than likely be fraudulent. You are saying that if the Apostle Paul included any historical details of the life of Christ in his epistles you would consider those entries fraudulent? &gt;establishing his writings in the context of the Passion tradition. Yes. But, again, where and when did the Passion tradition originate. Paul gives us no idea. &gt;He did. 1 Corinthians 15:1-8 is a testimony of who saw Jesus resurrected. Yes, he did report that people saw the risen Christ but nothing else. And, note that he does not say that anyone saw the risen Christ three days after he was crucified. In Paul's universe, Christ could have been slain from the foundation of the world. He gives no historical details of the life and death of a Galilean named "Jesus". &gt;would be evidence of later emendation Well, obviously, since the data has not been there for the last 1900 years for it to appear now would be emendation. But what kind of argument is that? It sounds like you're saying: "It's not there because God didn't put it there." 
If I ran into someone who asked I would lie, but I try to avoid people when I'm back home so I don't have that problem :P The very few people I care about when I go back home (I'm a graduate student), we have a tacit agreement to not do anything. So tonight I'll be reading LOTR or looking for something interesting online to read. 
I knew this couple who went to a New Years Eve party back in 1982. They were responsible, didn't drink, didn't do drugs, etc... they had three kids. Returning from the New Years Eve party, a drunk driver crossed the road median and struck their vehicle head on. They were killed instantly. The drunk driver got two years in jail for manslaughter and 17 years probation. As part of his probation, he has to mow their lawn / shovel the snow from their driveway every weekend... for 17 years. This happened in Syracuse, NY. So the short answer is no, I don't go to New Years Eve parties now that I am married with children.
Don't thank god. Thank him instead. Remember, a marriage vow is not to god, but to each other.
i also like MII over Rome. i think lack of variety is a hallmark of the Total War franchise. i for one got bored with Rome because of this reason. i think Medieval is actually *more* varied than Rome. maybe its because i generally didn't enjoy playing as the barbarians and there were so few Roman units.
I started off this year well, poured a large shot of Glenfiddich and downed it when the clock hit 12.  Happy new year everyone, let's try and make this decade a good one. 
I have 2000 and I have been a redditor for 2 years. I thought I had no life.
MMMM, very nice.  I know what that puts me in the mood for.
Running Zombies = Fucked.
That's one kick ass shirt you're wearing when you were a kid.
I don't get it?
Interesting enough, a slow song from Skillet began to play as I was reading this.  :)
You can't choose not to employ Due Process just because someone doesn't deserve it.
tricky to achieve; a fiction *vs.* a dead man.  ;)
Go see a psychologist, particularly one that specializes in treating anxiety disorders (trich is not really an anxiety disorder, but it responds to the same types of treatment). Trich can definitely be managed through psychotherapy and/or medication, and a psychologist should be able to refer you to a psychiatrist who could help you figure out if a medication other than Wellbutrin would be better for you. You can get a referral to a psychologist by asking your primary care physician, through your insurance company, or you can try looking through the [ACBT's Find a Therapist service](http://www.abct.org/dMembers/?m=mFindTherapist&amp;fa=FT_Form&amp;nolm=1&amp;CFID=845242&amp;CFTOKEN=22446054). 
I wish I had some stone.  I'm drinking O'dells 90 shilling
weeeelll...reread my comment. But I have to say it's purely platonic. I just went and upvoted all his comments, cause that's how we flirt in reddit, right? 
It's why I only buy Albertan (from Canada) beef.
9/11 comes to mind.  Dancing Israelis, enjoying slaughter as usual.
I don't know if you'd like them - they're not exactly high fantasy - but I have always loved Diane Duane's [Young Wizards series](http://www.amazon.com/s/ref=nb_ss?url=search-alias%3Daps&amp;field-keywords=young+wizards+series&amp;x=0&amp;y=0).  Not really (too) much romance, but the characters and the plots were always deeply heartfelt, and have stuck with me since I first read those books years ago.  
Goggles is currently only available for 1.6+, and HTC still hasn't updated beyond 1.5, so I'm unable to use it. :(
For a second I thought you said FF13 and my heart skipped :(
Try eBay, that's what I would do
Thanks for the upvote, but I was hoping even more for a reply with the next line.
this is a picture of you kickin a dog http://blog.beliefnet.com/jwalking/Darfur2.jpg
Barry White?
Uh, do I dare to admit that I sometimes do that too? :S (although I \*usually\* remember to clean the hairs off)  It's annoying to get a bunch of hair "stuck" on your hand and the most obvious way to get them unstuck is to stick them to a wall. Lately I've been doing this trick of rolling them into a ball of hair and throwing them into the toilet.
Pans Labyrinth if you haven't seen it already.
How did we get two hundred and forty dollars? Shhh... don't you worry your pretty little head...
Miro! I love it!
TL;DR: Derp-a-derp internet derp derp.
Getting hooked on Steam sales  godammit
You think you're pretty chubby do ya?
&gt; No one is going to make your life better for you except for yourself.  And there lies the problem. Most of our lives are pretty damn good, despite all the issues we like to bitch about. And we spend most of our energy keeping it that way.  And BTW, don't kid yourself about things being better outside the US. It's the same in all western democracies. Some countries may have more of a culture for strikes or demonstrations, but these days those are only used for short-term self interests. You think France is such a great example? Noticed how France's corrupt anti-piracy laws basically threw civil rights out of the window without a hint of protest?
this times 1,000,000,000,000
Finding an album with dynamic these days is very, very difficult.  The latest Wild Beasts album is fairly quiet compared to most albums these days, and I love the production quality on it.
Fucking aye.  This tendency by the media to give everything a name in order to refer to it - typically ending with gate, referring to something that happened 30 years ago, is retarded.  And another thing, what's up with categorizing a story by what they did instead of their names?  Underwear bomber, shoe bomber, balloon boy, etc.  MSM is partially to blame for the dumbing down of America.  /rant
I was expecting some kind of twist at the end.  TL;DR There is no twist, joke, or anything mildly entertaining.
whipped peppermint hot cocoa
At the risk of getting myself banned for complaining or suggesting otherwise, could I recommend that someone who so obviously posts flamebait, and then gets flamed, is equally deserving of a ban? Perhaps better to set both sides to zero and let folks start over (which it sounds like is one of the options you're considering, only a bit one sided)...  Just my .02 worth (which I suspect will soon be my .00 worth).
Indeed, I couldn't agree with you more.
You are being a condescending jackass with your flowery essay comebacks
I'm really glad it worked out for you. These types of situations rarely have such a clean, healthy resolution.
LA paparazzo?  Fuck you. Seriously. You're the annoying little twerp from 2nd grade who always screams, "I'M NOT TOUCHING YOU!" while holding your fingertip within biting distance. Use your talent for something respectable. Learn some landscape photography skills. Take a journalism class and expose atrocities in the world. At least join a P.I. firm or Cheaters, or something.  Until then, you are the bottom-feeding infectious scum of the earth. Stop stealing my oxygen, you insidious waste of human flesh.
Hey, get your own AMA. ;-P
The eyebrows, the pink, fleshy head, the oddly disproportionate balloon - this is grade-A nightmare fuel.
&gt; We where all really sure  &gt; happen sooner Rather then later.  Riddled with grammatical and spelling errors, which makes it hard for me to take the post seriously, much less call it "one of the best posts of the decade."  Yes, I'm that much of a snob.
I will say this; qgyh2 is one of reddit's most prolific submitters, and assuming it's really one person, s/he's actually a pretty nice person.  I don't know what that has to do with anything, but there it is. 
Don't you worry about it. It does go back! In fact, I ended up skinnier and hotter after than I was before! Enjoy this time and don't stress over that!!! I am not just saying that! It is the truth!
this is a picture of you kickin a dog http://www.nokilladvocacycenter.org/img/KickDog.jpg
Wait, I thought we were through this.  Or were you done editing your posts yet?  Are you going to edit this to something different when you're done?  I'm not sure what to reply to anymore.  Why don't you let me know when you're finished and then we can keep going, okay?
Tradition!  (If you're talking about the ones I think you're talking about they're called [Shakos](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shako).)
I'm a mailman. Please don't have a rough approach/departure to your mailbox if you must have it far off the road (large drop from road to dirt or over a driveway is the worst)  I use my own truck and they pay us per mile the same standard rate people get to go over smooth highways. Also, it's not funny when you make jokes about me giving you bills.
Have you even tried 7? Or are you going based on what a few retarded internet denizens are saying? Be a normal human being and grab a [$100 copy of Windows Home Premium](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16832116754&amp;cm_re=windows_7_oem-_-32-116-754-_-Product) and call it a day. This guy fucked up and got shafted by **DELL** not by Microsoft. 
connect the dots http://stocktwits.net/blog/2009/12/30/overheard-on-stocktwits-did-someone-know-something/
Hmm, now that I think about it, everyone I know from Europe wears orange.  It's like a thing over there.  He was probably wearing it to blend in!
death to all unbelievers!
Confucius: Day old karma is pointless.  Yoda: A dark path voting limitations is.  Tyler: Last rule of reddit karma is, do not talk about reddit karma.
The stupid thing about this video is the same argument can be made for any speed you are traveling at. You could use the same demonstration to show that you *should* be doing 10km/h under the speed limit.. just move the truck a little closer and you can finger waggle at the people doing the speed limit and having an accident.   It's not that excessive speed is safe, just that their implication that the official speed limit is a safe speed is not justified by this video, it's too condition dependent. For example if you have a road on a 15 degree slope typically the speed limit will be the same in both directions but a car traveling at 90 up the hill has a shorter stopping distance than a car traveling down the hill at 60. I can't see how this PSA should convince anyone to cede their own judgment of a safe speed to the official figures on the side of the road.
i'll routinely buy about five books at a time, read one, feel guilty i didn't read the other four, and then repeat.
As to your first paragraph, I'm not sure what you mean.  Are you suggesting that you fail to see the difference between someone breaking into your house, and willfully submitting to a search in order to obtain use of a convenience?  The first case is a clear case of the right to privacy being breached - the second, you have made a choice to allow someone to see you naked, in exchange for a privilege.  &gt;I pay rent for my housing. Since I don't own the flat, does that mean I don't have an expectation to privacy since it is not my property?  How in the world did you get that from what I said?  &gt;Apparently in America you only have rights if you own property. I wonder if have to be white too.  Really?  Are we even talking about the same thing anymore, or are you hijacking this thread to push some other agenda?
Yep, I use mine for almost everything. The only exceptions are eggs (it works great if the seasoning is in good shape, but Teflon works great period), and acidic foods like tomato sauce..They leach out the iron and get a metallic taste. For everything else though, it's absolutely unbeatable.
People see me as a 'jock' but i love all which you hate and have no interest in sports...gotta love labels
&gt;Another problem I have with "Paradox" is that the ideas are all expressed in a sort of pseudo-spiritual, New-Age-y, "Gee-whiz-can't-we-do-better-than-this" tone of voice. It's not only bad prose and poetry, it's weak philosophy. I hope I never sound like that."  And this, ladies and gentlemen, is why I hate George Carlin.
*tickles you in confusing places*
yes, great book, very well written. it's amazing how everyone at that time working that type of job lived the same life. no matter what part of the country.
You (if you're the one on the left) look like the love child of Nick Swardson and Will Ferrell.  
comment several times
Drink a lot of whiskey and champagne.
WTF? Am I the only one who read the whole thing twice but still can't figure out what this guy saw? Completely unclear.
Is this reddit's new crusade? Can't we just accept that whatever convention gets accepted will get accepted?
I got an ochocinco jersey for christmas :]
Well, the dog's mouth was like a fresh summer's eve...
in fact we could celebrate the end of a decade every day.
Absinthe.
That sounds almost as self destructive as my Enron stocks.
this is a picture of you kickin a dog http://www.nokillnow.com/CaughtInTheAct.jpg
Dir auch!
[eneru?](http://onepiece.wikia.com/wiki/Enel)
You hold too much stock in the opinion of others. 
I go with, "By Grabthar's hammer, thanks a lot, guy."
No, I'm the opposite of a shill...if anything, I just want to believe in my President. He's not perfect - gods knows, no one is - but he's a damn sight better that the double-dealing, wingnut fundies that are waiting to use this to "take back" the Senate and the House... It's like a nightmare. I honestly believe that we need to wait and see what they do next week. That's all.
so what would you do in their situation? they've been trying to sell their house for years, since it was clear that the mother wouldn't be taking custody of the girl again anytime in the foreseeable future. they kept reducing the asking price - it's now priced well below its value, but the housing market is terrible and has been for awhile.  they've got limited income. Are they supposed to just abandon their house, and find somewhere else to live with no money? would YOU be willing to give up your home, which you own fair and square, for nothing, and face trying to find a place to live on a limited income (various articles I've read have listed the grandmother's income at $18-20k, and say the grandfather is unable to work due to disability).  [This article](http://network.nationalpost.com/np/blogs/posted/archive/2009/10/27/tough-u-s-housing-market-complicates-six-year-old-s-eviction.aspx) even says that while they'd be willing to list their house for even less than they are now, the HOA's lawyer discouraged them because it would devalue the whole neighborhood.  What exactly are they supposed to do?
Mike Tyson enjoys Phil Collins.
ditto. too much camera shake, out of focus, and poor exposure. sorry gatzke. 
Your link directly contradicts you. For example, it presents a simple if-statement as an example of lazy evaluation:  &gt;Even in most eager languages if statements evaluate in a lazy fashion. `if a then b else c` evaluates (a), then if and only if (a) evaluates to true does it evaluate (b), otherwise it evaluates (c).  No sequences there!  Lazy evaluation can be simply, as your link describes, when an "expression is only evaluated if the result is required by the calling function". In my example, the functions created by startsWith and endsWith are not evaluated until later (i.e., when required) as indicated by invoking select, hence it is lazily evaluated.
That last bit was was hysterical. A dude with a wicker basket helm; Is it  to strike fear in his enemies, or are they supposed to die laughing when they see it?
5th
It didn't rape me. I worked my way up from buying in for 40 cents. The bad play at the lowest stakes *more* than makes up for the increased rake.
I think that was the Neverland Ranch
Law school. 
Looks like you're going solo here too, well, I guess not anymore :)  Cheers, and Happy New Year!
Memories of Murder  The Host  Thirst  Sorcerer  Used Cars  Night Shift
dammit, beat me to it.
Indeed, there was a strong shockwave coming off of that tower right at the start of the explosion. Been telling people about that for years, great to see AE911Truth getting on particular details.
Living well... is the best revenge
I do, actually, in the Midwest -- Nebraska, specifically. I got an MIP when I was 20 and could enroll in a program called "Diversion" which is basically like a traffic school for minor alcohol offenses. Marijuana is decriminalized here, so some of those cases are eligible, too. A few weekends of 8-hour classes and a dozen hours of community service hours, plus a hefty fee, and my record was clean.  AFAIK you can only do it once, and it's not always allowed. It is a pre-trial program, though, which is nice.
this is a picture of you kickin a dog http://pages.prodigy.net/anaconda/iguano1.jpg
Finding your recipe for life after loss. 
Yeah but people have heard the Kooks from all the TV shows and commercials that use their music: Shine On - Michelob,  Love it All - Chuck,  Scrubs used Always where I Need to Be in their promos. And They're currently working on their third album.  But  your main point is right, there is some good stuff coming out of the UK right now.  See Arctic Monkeys.
The speaker on my phone is broken, so vibrate's the only choice i have
A lot of the brands fit differently as well. RBK and CCM have flatter footbeds with less of an arch than say, Bauer. I can't even get my foot in a Bauer skate after wearing CCMs for years.
Thank you very much. That is what I have been suspecting ever since my own experiences with the DMT. Once again, dear Humaniteer, thank you very much! You have an awesome New Year and a superb New Decade!
I think you can put a keyword in your profile with [[reddit]] so people can do a search.  edit: done.   edit2: wow, there were 176 people who had already done this. Should have checked sooner.   edit3: closest redditor is, like, 300 miles away. :-(   edit4: D'oh! http://www.reddit.com/r/OkCupid/
Karma!
defaultdict objects.   from collections import defaultdict  d = defaultdict(int)  for item in xrange(100):   d[random.randint(0,20)] += 1  With a regular dict object this will raise an error if the key doesn't exist, so you have to write a couple or more lines to explicitly check.  I do a lot of counting of this sort, and when I first started learning python, coming from perl, I found the regular dict object to be a big hassle, since perl gave you this functionality for free. I was stoked when I found out about defaultdict.
JJ hasn't been involved in the show since season 1.  But if it ends that way, it's time to stab *someone.*
Why/how did you even notice that?
&gt;Many 64-bit systems limit each task to 4 Gig.  Name one.  My employer has been running on 64-bit Linux for something like 3 years, specifically to get processes over 4GB.
[This is the recipe I use.](http://find.myrecipes.com/recipes/recipefinder.dyn?action=displayRecipe&amp;recipe_id=1734314) Sometimes I steam them, sometimes I bake them. Either way, they're delicious.
No.  Really! xxx
this is a picture of you kickin a dog http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Back_Off_Boogaloo
gender doesn't come in complete sets, you know? there's a lot more variety and flexibility than you're apparently aware of. you should read about intersex conditions and actually look into studies on the etiology of transsexualism.
Good explanation.
dvdfab has been serving me well lately.
I second Goodwill.  Great place to get the basics and that 10 year old, never used, Ice Tea Maker.
Depends, is he the type of guy who likes to do a lot of stuff on his own? (home repairs, car repairs, etc.) if so, he just might like it. If not, go with a DE. It's very likely that he will enjoy it.
You would think a debt of 900k would put them under for good...damn, whats it gonna take?
&gt;Do you really think eating unhealthy animals is healthy?  Sure, why not?  Predators seek out the weak and infirm. &gt; Do you think the untreated cow sewage is good for your water supply?  Of course not, but its not like our water supply isn't terrible with or without cow sewage.  It's a drop in the bucket.
I can't believe Carlin ripped off Woody Allen. I wouldn't have thought he'd have such good taste
Just get a cheap logitech usb webcam and plug it in, they have good sound quality. Having a mic isn't really an elitist thing and not having one is a bit like playing without a mouse in this day and age.
what are you wearing?
Faction has been set as Horde.
[Mute the left-hand video.](http://www.youtubedoubler.com/?video1=http://www.youtube.com/v/kNAUR7NQCLA&amp;video2=http://www.youtube.com/watch%3Fv%3DOB4DYhstn98)
I second the AMA notion. Sorry dude, maybe if you were gay you'd be more interesting. :D Good luck with the siblings. 
Umm, thats why there is soap. Im sorry you have been with dirty guys before....
I did something like that this year. I was sick last week and cancelled all my plans. I'm all better now, but I didn't tell anyone. I wanted to finish reading The Nation by Terry Pratchett. So Happy New Year! (It's one o'clock here)
Yeah I don't care about karma, I'd just rather not participate if thats the maturity level that we are dealing with.
So, in other words, you have no problem proclaiming 6 people murders because 1 of those 6 said they were.  Interesting.  No need for trials of multiple suspects when one of the suspects proclaims guilt, in your world.  &gt;U.S. Attorney Jeffrey Taylor said  Well then folks, no need for a trial, Jeffrey Taylor said something, automatically they are guilty.  So much for a trial in your world because they are already guilty without one!
Cigarette smoke is definitely what talk shows today are lacking.
Juxtaposition of irony.
TL;DR But everyone who doesn't frequent /r/politics already does this.
Anonimity should be prized a cherished on the internet. You are totally anonymous apart from the collection of comments you've made under one psuedonym. Nothing about this account I'm posting on directly links to me, and as such, I am totally anonymous. I think it is more a sign of idiocy for not cherishing and embracing anonimity, as I fear in years to come we will fondly remember these days of the internet something akin to the lawlessness of the wild west.
You do realize that the drug dealing is still criminal offense? And if you are a tourist and don't know the city, where will you find drug dealer? There is a lot of shredded mortar being sold to those gullible enough.
I can't.  I have an old Mac with a 32-bit processor.  sniff.. :-(
you got me!  :)
Nope.  I can tell male and female cats apart relatively easily (if they are full-grown).  Dogs I have a harder time with, but it tends to become evident if you spend enough time with them.  The males try to hump your leg every once in awhile.  Usually get punched in the face for it.
I was bringing pretty much the same story, except the game was Castlevania 64, she used chocolate syrup, and insisted I keep playing.  10 years later, I can't get her to blow me.
http://www.chuckstudios.com/omegle/
I always loved the last sentence of that story. 
Happy to!  Do you mind I've started already?
looks like a messed up captcha
Yes, because he has no arguments of substance.  He is just flinging Chomsky cliffnotes and hoping it'll stick. Here's a lesson for the kids out there:  You need to be able to back up  your arguments.  Saying this is so or that is so without being able to support it will get you nowhere.
What do you do?  What promotion?  And why do you think you're not getting it?
http://www.crazyblinddate.com/  OKCupid, like most of the other sites, is a good way to just get out and meet new people without it being a bar.  Historically I've not been a dating man, more looking for relationships, and I've always found those via communities I was involved with (clubs in school, online gaming, etc), but my friends who do more dating say to pretty much treat things like OKCupid like a bar.  Have fun, be open minded, be relaxed, have a good date and you'll be fine.  Just like a bar, everyone puts their best foot forward on these sites, and so should you.  Just like a bar, sometimes you'll approach someone (online) and they'll turn you down.  But at least the size of the pool is a bit larger and you know more about them, so you'll have more initial success.  Like you, I dig OKCupids look/feel/philosophy more than others, but the quality of people is not necessarily better.  Manage your expectations and have some fun, and they're a fine place to meet new people.  99% of all people are average, and that's true on these sites too :)
When internet mods like you act like fascists, people start to fight back. You're just clueless as the OP Sperger Soze, if you start mass banning people I'll write and distribute a Greasemonkey script that AUTOMATICALLY goes through someone's previous posts and downvotes them. 
Great idea. Next thanksgiving, after the family has the prayer, I'll ask that everyone hold hands while I thank the people who bought and cooked the meal.
I think this is the new YEAHHH. Make it really really unfunny and then finish off with a lack luster Yeahhhhhh...
I have been paraphrasing Chris Rock for comedic effect: something you as a non-American have no idea about, hehehe.....
I think what Jefferson actually said was "yea".
Fox
World Taekwondo Federation FTW, but I did ATA.
Are you kidding me with Creed at #18?  Holy fuck.
Well, they're *obviously* all looking for his protective cup. Isn't that the first place you'd look?
What if we just did a http://pininthemap.com/ with our usernames?  I've started one [here](http://pininthemap.com/6c9a8349ded9bcc4f) to see if anyone wants to do it.  Password is 'reddit.'
Giving serious thought to this...
your 4 im 5 you have to do what i say  this is fuckec http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=miFS41PWl6g
Hello, ben,   I will do whatever the hell I want.    ddrt   P.S. pull any more shit in Lost and you're done.
Are you certain of this? Best of luck to you, sir.
the one tipping back the whiskey with zombie blood still on me shirt. I don't photo well :)
I'm at home with my family.  It's *strongly* against my interest to drink tonight.
An alternative question is: could we manipulate lifeforms such as bacteria so that they would be at home on Mars.  If we could do that then I think the essential condition for Mars being terraformed is met.  Mars would then be a new home for Terran life.  
(for my part) The male acid orgasm is just as good quantitatively, but the psychedelic imagery is merely an amplification of the biological. She was the definition of curviness and curvosity, while I was a glorious electric guitar/pistol/piston of pumping power. It was so good that I came for like, ten minutes. : D
&gt;I showed you historical evidence. Written pornography was primarily consumed by men for a very long time.  That doesn't prove correlation.   &gt;If visual pornography was really THAT hardwired, we would expect to see etchings of erotic acts being as popular as written erotic works in the 18th and 19th centuries. They weren't.  etchings arn't exactly as effective as the real thing. That's like suggesting that a stick figure of two people having sex is more powerful than an erotic novel. Men are visual by nature, but that doesn't mean that everything they see that suggests sex gets the off. At the time, written erotica was the closest thing they could get. Again, provide scientific evidence.. meaning from a credible source, or your claim is pretty empty. One could easily just as well say that it is a fact that it works to drill holes in people's heads to fix head aches because that's what people did in the medieval times, but we have adapted to other medicine because thats what we use now. 
Golden Girls: Theme Song....and i'm a straight male
Download timed out.   Retry? 
Sorry, man.  Hope you're wrong about it, though.
If the result of your actions is either that the child will be taken from her family (without evidence the family was mistreating or neglecting her) or that the family (and thus the child) will be forced into significantly worse conditions, then to do so would be wrong. Thus I feel the ethical course would be to let them stay or help them find somewhere else to go. If it happened to me, of course, I'd be sorely tempted to exercise my rights.
POLITICO posted a story discussing Democrats in Congress supposedly dithering over whether to tack to the left or center in the upcoming 2010 election. However, unlike the Republicans who must choose between their base of racists, religious extremists, and economic royalists and independents who find them morally repulsive, the Democrats could easily appeal to both their progressive base and independents by implementing progressive policies that broad majorities of Americans would support
"As in the case of Afghanistan and Iraq," eh?  &gt; The network said the Obama administration and the long-time Yemeni dictator, Field Marshal Ali Abdullah Saleh, had reached an agreement to allow the US to fly cruise missiles, fighter jets and armed drones, used for remote-control assassinations, in Yemeni airspace.  Cause, yeah, in Afghanistan and Iraq, they worked out a cooperation agreement with the respective governments ahead of time...
Well, it's on Netflix and "watch instantly" and also you can find crappy quality ones of Youtube, it's "War on Porn" from the last season.
Rant, rant, rant, dur, duh rant dur duh. 
Correction: 1680x1050.  I own one of those "stupid" little displays, haha, but I feel your pain.  I would definitely guess that a 1080p 120hz screen is either in the works, or planned to be released soon.
As awesome as that was, I'm sure the hardcore republicans will just call her "unpatriotic" and go on rants about how she's wrong. Fuckin' morons.
Holy shit!
Do you have any other health problems such as heart murmurs, anxiety, depression, exercise endurance loss, cholesterol, etc? Anything?
Listen to the main chord sequence (violins/ cellos) on the chorus of OSD - it's pretty much the whole of The Fear re-jigged
go ahead... click it.  i'll expect a report on my desk by the end of the day on what happened.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Social_engineering_(security)
Upvote for starfox, super Mario, and goldeneye
I did a quick google on it, didn't realize that tripod was blocking redirects. GG imgur.
Orbital and Tycho are similar... Orbital tends to have a more intense/harsh sound than Tycho though.
No, No.  Roll out wichya pole out.
Thanks for the clarification. 
Kind of a stupid comment, because you can definitely incorporate three slices of bread and Nutella *into* a diet plan, just would need some work-around.   OPs diet doesn't look abnormally worse than anyone else in America's; in a way, it's probably a lot better since it doesn't involve the usual breakfast of coffee, small lunch, and gigantic dinner (followed by invariable food coma). Which leads me to suspect some type of diet, or some kind of serious hypothyroidism, or that the OP is grossly underestimating his diet.   (In perspective, when I am around my usual weight (female, 5'6", 150), I eat between 2500 - 3000 cal/day, presuming routine exercise. And a lot more than what the OP posted above, honestly...and won't gain weight.)
Did a potential sex partner ever walk away from you because of it?  Were you ever the object of ridicule in school (showers, etc.)
I think that is a very bad idea.
&gt;Actually, I'm not. I don't think you understand philosophy as well as you try to portray.  I asked why I should value science. That is inherently a moral question.   &gt;Because, like nearly everything else you've posted, this is nonsense.  Please paraphrase the argument. Simply throwing links is not conducive to the discussion.   &gt;The presupposition that the efficacy of magic/religion/mysticism is more reliable than demonstrably provable results is either intellectually lazy or dishonest.  That wasn't my argument. I asked what if I value Religious experience more than Science?   &gt;Not because of the religious aspect, but because you fancy magical thinking, belief and personal "facts" over logical/rational/pragmatic thinking and knowledge.  Why is the latter better than the former, objectively speaking.  &gt;Irrelevant  No its very relevant.   &gt;Science can and does produce these reliable, reproducible results. Religion cannot.  So what? Religion doesn't aim to do that in the first place. You're comparing apples and oranges.   &gt;You'd have to be intellectually dishonest as hell to both use modern technology and distrust science's ability to produce largely reliable results.  That still isn't a rational reason for why I should value Science over Religion. 
Sorry man, I hope you get better. I on the other hand can drink and I want to party tonight except I can't .. because of that dude in the article, he's an asshole he's pretty much like your ulcer. 
Rick needs his own channel. 
FAKE!  That's not the same shirt.
I can understand a man doing that to a woman but a woman doing it to a man? I'd need a hell of a wax myself....
Man, whatever! The guy's guilty as shit! We all know that.  EDIT: Um...are you down voting cause it sounds like I'm pronouncing Woody Allen guilty even though it's an Idiocracy quote responding to the Idiocracy quote above and my first post was defending Woody Allen or because you just don't like the movie?
What is the worst kind of dispatch?  I remember another person saying it was the accidents involving motorcycles.
My sister's fiance owns a liquor store, so, everything. Cheers!
&gt; True conservatism in government is about limiting "the state," having sound money, and protecting the civil liberties and rights of every citizen regardless of race, sexual orientation, or what invisible magical being they believe exists.  That sounds nice and I don't doubt that you are sincere but I have never seen one of these mythical creatures in real life or in the media.  Can you name one?  Can you please demonstrate what, if any, political influence they have?  Every conservative I have ever heard spout these lines barely took a breath before they are on to supporting the War on Drugs, militarizing the police, pushing 3 strikes, building more prisons, advocating for Star Wars missile defense projects, wanting to bomb any country that looked at us cross-eyed, pushing religion, etc.  Seriously, I know a few of the conservatives you speak of exist and I occasionally read their blogs and books, but do they count for anything in the political process or are they just a nice academic idea that can't actually exist outside the minds of few intellectuals and their followers?
And the Jonas Brothers are millionaires.
From what I remember in conlaw:  Checking the outside of a car or luggage with a drug-sniffing dog is not an unreasonable search because it only detects contraband. See *Illinois v. Caballes*  It's also not an unreasonable seizure of luggage because it doesn't meaningfully interfere with the passenger's possessory interest. See *United States v. Gant*
i just grabbed a quick google for that. good call on global avg though, i will use [NOAA's datasets](http://cdiac.ornl.gov/trends/co2/cmdl-flask/cmdl-flask.html) in future dealings with GW deniers. 
"thanks to reddit" k.
Even if you don't do any SSE, 16-byte alignment probably helps with cache performance, since cache lines are 16 bytes.
Yeah, just stay calm and cool!
bobby flay treats his knife's poorly. i have no respect for the finger sucking douche.
Yeah, that would make more sense for vxsarin's post. Reddit needs a wikipedia-like feature to require a reason for editing your post.
I found Paranormal Activity by mistake. Interesting.
What would you do? Would these neighbors be the kind of people that make fun of you for prepping or ridicule people for owning firearms?
The Reddit-Gods have seen fit to make it so that a person can't post links to quickly.  Can the Reddit-Gods make it so that you can't downvote the same person more than twice per minute or something?
Sometimes. I have friends and know how to act around them, but around strangers I am quite awkward.
When I met Karl, he was studying interior decorating while blasting Broadway showtunes.  He also had some dude's cock in his mouth.  It all made me a bit suspicious now that I think back on it.
oh no! Marvel is ruined. Even as a disney fan, they have too much.
You mean reddit can be accessed outside my work's firewall and at home? This is going to majorly cut into fap time....
You forgot to mention the cuntiness of His Royal Cuntness Tony "The Cunt" Blair
If your back can take it...I would.  haha.  Don't get a hernia!
I think the original point was probably that if OP thinks the dad is wailing on the kids, call 911 right away.  I'm not sure either one was advocating a false report.  And it's not too late to file a report on the original incident, just because things have settled down.
Fair enough. I agree that's it's easier to cultivate than other plants, but to get something worthwhile it still takes a decent amount of work. The plant itself will grow wild, yes, but to get something more than a literal weed, you can't just ignore it for 3 months and then harvest.
jim beam and ice water.
No, no, wai--ALL GLORY TO THE HYPNOTOAD!
On the one hand - No one gets to take Reddit Karma to their grave.  On the other - there is the larger issue of karma and living in this world in a way that lets you lie there in those last minutes of life and know in peace that you tried your best - a god or lack thereof notwithstanding.  Every capricious, self-serving downvote - versus - every time you allow a bit of room for the voices of others that you might respectfully disagree with - or every upvote that you offer in true support.  Work it all like real life - and you might just get better at real life.  And when your real life is about done - you'll know how you did.  Be good.  Fight evil.  Try to know the difference.
I wonder how often the train comes through.
seven pounds
For topic 3, and I could be completely wrong, but the show I was watching said that the center of a black hole becomes a wormhole.  Is this not correct?  For topic 6, tidal forces spaghettify you from what perspective?  According to the perspective of the self, there is not spagghetification, right?  
Not trying to be a jerk or anything, but if you are going to spend $130 on a pair of headphones, why don't you just buy speakers? I know nothing about audio technology but this seems silly to me unless you are stuck in a dorm or have roommates/family. Is there an advantage to this?
HA! Take this:  [x movie on Ebert's *personal* list] is good, but/and should have a different place on the list than it does.
The land where we learn the three 'R', only one of which begins with 'R'.
There is nothing here.
Bombs would cure this. So would more McDonald's. TV. Cars. **WALMART**!
Do an IAMA?
The 360 D-pad is bearable, but plinking on a controller is still horrible. You can do well with a gamepad, but it's an unnecessary handicap and you will eventually have to unlearn it...
Ok, whatever you need to tell yourself.
Start smoking.
Thats kind of true then, though the assassins do attempt to train Desmond as an assassin within days using the bleeding effect of the Animus.
Fixed. Thanks.
I am convinced that the vibrate feature ruined my phone because that's all it was ever on. 
Where's a stray bomb when you really need one.
fuck you die stop sucking my cock!
You're crazy.  It sounds like your wife stepped up and did the HUMANE thing.  Your dog wasn't living; it was simply existing.  It hardly had any quality of life.  I'm sorry this probably wasn't what you wanted to hear, I know how hard it is to lose a beloved dog, but man...divorce your WIFE for putting down a fourteen year old (very sick) dog?  I'm just...stunned....that you would consider divorce over something like this.  It's not like she killed a puppy in cold blood.  I don't blame her for wanting to put the dog out of its misery.  She probably didn't call and tell you she was going to do it because she knew you'd flip shit and not let her put the poor thing down and she'd have to continue cleaning up after it.  (did you ever help with that, btw?)  IMO, you were being selfish by keeping the dog alive.  If you want to divorce her over the dog...well...jesus.  THAT'S fucked up.  It's just weird to me, man.  And I'm a BIG TIME animal lover.
wow - do gun owners actually act like that!?
red sounds good with medium well steak right about now
Usually that would mean it's strongly within my interests to drink.
I think exposing live traffic graphs would be too useful for spammers. please don't. 
2001 (and 2010 since it is the right year, but it is not as good)
This is awesome. In my suburban white-kid indie rock world, i wouldn't have found this.
[THIS](http://www.vbox7.com/play:e02e8afe) is Sharp Dressed man.
No but you might like to mix it up with some more original alternatives like shazbot, smeg and frell
No one questioned you homes.
in the UK it would be actual bodily harm, an open and shut case with witnesses, and prison time
Read this as "Worlds Largest Largesaber"
First poster, then outfit.
[Stop stalking.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L3sIiT1b39M)
Inherit the Wind  http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0053946
If you have to rely on your security procedures being secret in order to be effective, they aren't effective security procedures.
&gt; a.k.a. "The ill-thought out counting system that jumped directly from 1BC to 1AD with no year Zero in between".  Agreed in full -- it was ill-thought out, and almost assuredly due to the fact they didn't have a 0 symbol in their numeral system.  &gt; And for some reason (or more likely, due to a lack of reasoning skills) some people are hell-bent on making the year counting and naming system incredibly awkward for humans and computers alike,  This has no bearing on computers. The only thing that matters is if a decade (and by implication, century and millennium) starts on a year that ends with a 0 or ends with a 1. The general public usually *prefers* a 1, it's actually usually harder to convince people that counting should usually start at 0. If you look at a simple number table of 100 numbers, it usually is in rows of 10 starting at 1 and ending at 100.   This makes absolutely nothing harder for people, let alone computers. It's simply an issue of proper vocabulary.  I've done years of C.S. and Math work, in and out of school. I like it when systems start counting from 0, and it irks me when they don't. But the simple fact is that we didn't do the right way originally, and changing our casual vocabulary to fit a slightly prettier system doesn't make sense to me. It takes almost no extra thought to figure out, just get it right when you speak.
People like you made middle and highschool a living hell for me. I'm in college now and I still don't trust many of my friends because of shit people like you did. It was more psychological than physical. Please don't take this as me bashing you or anything like that, I guess it's just a way to get out my feelings.
Well said on the homework but I guess our schools are completely different.  We have students talking up a storm, shouting throughout the whole of class, and all the teacher would say is, "If you don't stop I will give you a detention! I really mean it!"  Never mind that it would be the 5th time you said it in class and you have never punished a single child ever. Whether it be for cheating, cursing at you, etc.   I will admit I was being unreasonable with the homework.
Everybody, pretty much. And i think it's cool when i walk into a room and have no idea what im there for..better than drugs.
I want to be where you are tonight, now.
Black eyed peas and cabbage
20  I was born on Father's Day! (first-born, too :3)
70% iso alc and warm water.   Some retard in here doesn't know what iso. is. 
i browse from EVERYWHERE. via iphone app.
Can you talk about the different personality tests that are available? Which are good for what, and which are of little to no value at all?
Might I ask why you're covered in zombie blood?
Even if it is contaminated with Salmonella, chances are it contains very little of it and that her immune system will fight it off. Just get plenty of rest and don't drink too much alcohol (it may mess with the nonpathogenic bacteria that protect your body from harmful ones)
All of a sudden I have the urge to buy a Wiimote and download Super Mario Galaxy...
This one I can actually relate to!  Your eye adjusts to shoot at anything that moves and those little scraps of paper don't help.  But I think the worst is the levels with the chickens in cages. When I first played that level I died like this 5 times because I shot at the chickens
Champagne!
Happy New Year! Got a couple of Jaques next to me!  *Edit: Hmm, I went straight on to Reddit after watching the fireworks... Should I be embarrassed?*
I like her.
I'm drinking the "complimentary" bottle of champagne that comes with our tickets to the Can Can (thecancan.com).
Yah I discovered that today, I would've incorporated that into this had I known about it a few hours sooner.
My eye doctor told me an interesting thing about adjusting the diopter in your camera. Maybe it's common sense, but I'd never thought about it: It can't compensate for astigmatism. Though I could purchase a diopter with strong enough correction to theoretically correct for my awful vision, areas of the viewfinder are still going to be blurry. Even my contacts seem to play tricks on me when I'm looking through a camera, so I shoot 100% of the time with my glasses on. And I've learned to trust my autofocus. A lot.
just take him with you
Oh I wasn't accusing you of ripping it from Wikipedia, I was just trying to make a joke to say I stole a research paper from Wikipedia, which was written very much like your post.
And Mario does it all for a chick who'll just get kidnapped again in a couple of years.
Ooh.. I hadn't seen that one before. +1 for you!
Yes, but it also mentions this at the top:  &gt; Another bogus Carlin piece about life going backwards
No need; it now says she's been found.
I never act up with police - just be normal!
Yea you know me dawg, we're winners, we're bred from a whole different DNA. YEAAA, now if you don't mind I gotta go home and hit the weights. ALPHA male up in here! 
Sure....  But that's only because by the time he had a son, he had already used Adam.  Jesus, second string. Just the facts.
I'm game. Point by point, what part of what she said was untrue?  And yes. MSNBC is biased towards the left. I'm not disputing that. But that doesn't discount the fact that Maddow is one of the only people out there doing mostly fair and mostly balanced journalism. When she interviews people she disagrees with she is *civil* and *does not shout* and allows them to speak with out having to yell over her. She also calls out those on the left when they deserve it, just as much as those on the right. She's been very critical of the 'blue dog' democrats and all of their gimmicks they've pulled with the health care bill. Hell, if Fox New's had someone similar on their channel, I'd watch them too. In fact, I actually really enjoy Shepherd Smith.   I can't speak for the rest of MSNBC's line up, but Maddow is the real deal.
my thoughts exactly.
The [context for our thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/environment/comments/ak97b/there_is_plenty_renewable_energy_to_fight_global/c0i06w2) pitted physical limits of possible renewable energy generation against practicality and feasibility in production/economic/resource terms.  You responded that there are plenty of idiots who think it is impossible, which reads "*physically impossible*" in context, and linked to someone who said it was *economically impossible*.  That's all I've been pointing out.  I thought you made a mistake in your link, but I see now that you made a mistake in reading simonsarris' comment.  You don't even know what you're arguing against.  You've just repeated the NoMoreNicksLeft quote in every would-be refutation without adding anything.  Tip: arrogance and egoism are unbecoming.
how about care bears?
...and the level of discussion sinks further.  Keep digg-ing, guys.
&gt; And please explain the animosity toward anarcho-capitalism, any elaboration would be greatly appreciated.  There really shouldn't be any animosity. I suspect most of the conflict arises from people on both sides not knowing exactly the position of the other side. The common anarcho-"capitalist" position just defends the right of people to own the product of their labor plus the natural resources used in the process. The "hierarchies" only begin to exist in the extreme sense (see [here](http://polycentricorder.blogspot.com/2009/10/two-sided-dillema.html)) but this is true for the "social"-anarchists as well. The conflict is largely semantical although few will admit it. "Capitalism" in the anarcho sense has more to do with respect for the product of labor than it is given credit (see [here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LLFQ1okRZzM))
Out of curiosity, without citing anyone else's words, what is the primary distinguishing feature of house, as it relates to trance, and vice versa? 
Once again, your little fingers cannot resist dabbling.   I warned you about this before, and I won't repeat my long explanation here. I shall simply remark that you have reached another goalpost on the slide towards digghood.   I realize that popularity spoils everything, and that slide was inevitable, but I was hoping that it would be slow enough for me to have time to find something else as informative, interesting, and democratic as reddit used to be.   Alas, the power of administrative rights is such that whenever a small problem rears its ugly head, someone with such rights is always tempted to put a spin on the ball, thereby replacing the little problem with a big one.   It's not unlike trying to beat mice to death with a rattlesnake. 
Woooah! Does using f instead of w let you set a lower timeout?
something on spankwire, I guess
Man, that is so twentieth century.  No one gets a gold watch for retirement anymore, no one gets a pension.  Most of the under 50 crowd will be working almost their entire life.
Largest economic expansion in US history. And you're nit picking.   I'm not saying Clinton was perfect by any means. But give credit where credit is due. 
No One Lives Forever
Sitting in the AA in Battlefield 2 is the same. No heli, no plane, but as soon as you leave the AA, &gt;kerpow&lt; A-10 bombs you into oblivion.
Google.com, just click I'm feeling lucky.  I got this;  http://imgur.com/BzOu8.png
Personally I really think the best headset I've ever used is the Steelseries siberia. You can wear them for hours with no pain. I'm just curious if this headset is as comfortable as the Siberas.
whoa what happened to the hair?
28th
Oh, I was thinking you were responding just to me, and being kind of trollish about it. I see what you mean, though.  On the other hand, I kind of wish IAmA's couldn't even be made without submitting proof.
You're right, but she's a total bitch for offing the dog without telling him. It's shitty to do to kids and downright condescending to do it to an adult.
The problem with pay limits is the executives who are good at their job probably have more then enough saved up to not worry about getting another job, while the ones who are bad at it need the money to keep living their extravagant lifestyle. 
No, no: upvotes for figuring out a way to make Episode I almost decent. You should shoot our dear friend Mr. Lucas an e-mail about this. I mean, we all know how much he loves editing and re-releasing his own work. He just might bite at this suggestion...
Shit covered sickly beef washed in ammonia, it's what's for dinner.™ 
Apple Juice because I have man flu. Fuck New Years anyway. Another pointless celebration an excuse for people to make cunts out of themselves.
So did we come to a conclusion? is it going to be  "twenty ten"? or "Two Thousand Ten"?  Happy NEW YEAR!
make sure you pause the vid before the cartoon gives the answer away!
I was going to stay home and re-watch Fight Club but then I called my friend and we went out to her friend's house for a bbq. I cooked the french fries and then we went to the top of some building to watch the fireworks of the entire city. It was pretty fun, at least this year I went out (I usually just stay home in front of my PC).
Speaking as one who has yet to graduate college (and as a potential employer...someday)...  I would hope that every reddit post is not safe for work...?  If I'm paying someone to work, I expect them to be working.
Just like my story, cept for instead of Brazil it was Fresno, and instead of Carnival it was 7-11
F*ck the glossary.  The entire point is that the language Alex uses is a slang, which means you pick it up as you go along.  Don't worry about being wrong sometimes; just enjoy the text and the musicality of the language.  Usually by the time you get a quarter way through the book, it's coming much more naturally.
Grilled cheese sandwiches made with Veggie Slices brand soy cheese.
Thank you for the brilliantly concise and easily repeated way for me to sound smart, funny, and politically up-to-date for all of the girls I try to impress.
I look forward to the Spiderman/Mickey crossover movie.
What of the police see the gun and later get mad!??
Nice one. You just knew you were going to get down voted on everything because of this. Suffer in silence young man.
Yup, never go ATG with a cartridge.
$65 before you start 5NL, and drop back to 2NL at $40.  $165 before you start 10NL, and drop back to 5NL at $115.  $390 before you start 25NL, and drop back to 10NL at $265.  Or something like that.
B-52s and whatever else I can concoct.
I don't know who down voted you, but that is cool and awesome to know.
I used to work for Gateway at a call center. I got passed over again and again for a promotion. Then a manager friend of mine told me why. He said that I was taking 20% of the calls for a 20 person team, and my manager didn't want to lose me on the phones. So he told all the other managers not to hire me as a lead. You have to be very knowledgeable and self reliant, but not put up stellar numbers at the same time. I just went elsewhere after I got tired of it. The boss offered me a job on the spot as a team lead, and I asked him why he hadn't done it sooner, and he said he didn't think I was going to leave. I told him that would have been great 3 months earlier, but since I already got hired somewhere else at a higher salary, at a higher position, thanks but no thanks. 
I was out on my new Giant STP doing some dirt jumping, and some friends and I were taking a break and sitting on our bikes. I stood up and hopped my bike up onto the back wheel to blow off some steam but overbalanced and started to hop off the back. The problem was, my feet would not come off the damn pedals, I had upgraded to Easton Flatboys the day before, and it was like my feet were superglued to the pedals.   This all ended with an excruciating slow-motion fall right on to my head and upper back, made worse when everyone pissed themselves laughing.
That's awesome but I was hoping for Buckaroo Banzai
But they get to invade/bomb and control a new country every time it happens!
Dude. The last day of the decade, and I managed to get by without ever seeing or hearing about those glasses, until now.  Damn you.
I know there is friction between Digg and Reddit - but if this can get to the front page of digg, there is little doubt they can build a new school somewhere in a developing country.  Here is the link to the digg page. Let's do some good. Digg this story. http://digg.com/d31EFvL  (and no, i'm not the person who posted this on digg. I just want to see a school built)
Haha.  I've been dealing with a lot of reading (and some writing) on countably and uncountably infinite as of late. Somehow "countable" slipped in there subconsciously. 
Sorry, too cold I guess. But have some [Duck Vaginas!](http://www.funnyordie.com/videos/516c6a5a5e/louis-ck-duck-vaginas-from-standupfan)
White Castle's frozen burgers
No it's not terminal. The issue is that she has arthritis throughout her body. Unfortunately it appears to bug her the most on the pad of her foot and as such she's licked it for the past year to help "scratch" the itch. As you know cat's tongues are like sandpaper, so she's essentially killed the tissue on her pad by licking it so much and has made a bloody mess of it.   As of a couple months ago I noticed she started to get a bit more agitated with it as she would actually gnaw at it trying to relieve the "itch" from the arthritis. When I looked closer it almost looked like she had punctured through to the bone. We had the vet take a look at it, but all he could do was give her some steroids to help with the itching but of course this is something he had to inject and it would only last a few days. So for months on end I would sterilize the wound, apply polysporin and wrap in gauze. After I wrapped it up, I even had to use hockey tape and tape it tightly to her foot otherwise she would tear off the bandage. I went about for a month or so changing the bandage every night, but at her age she doesn't appear to heal fast, if heal at all, so there was really no change. At this point we had the vet stitch it close, and since then she's been living with a cone on her head and limping around. I think she's doing better then she was months ago as it's obviously not bugging her as much, but she still try's to get at it which is why the cone is still on her head.  We all know she's nearing the end, and it will be the worst day of my life when we finally decide to put her down. It's not so much that the abcess is killing her, it's just causing her discomfort and pain, and I'd rather not have her live in that much pain.  Thanks for the hugs, I'll be sure to pass them onto my cat :P I do hope something miraculous happens with my cat, but only time will tell :)  Once again, hope your cat has many years left ahead :)
Yeah, I've been kind of spooked while in my room since then!
Abolish health inspections and completely deregulate the capitalist, food service industry...  Hm, this just might make people eat out less and take better care of their bodies. I'm all for it!
^ Credit union or local community bank. 
As long as "unified" doesn't mean "put all your eggs in one basket".  Far too many "unified communications solutions" have a plethora of SPOFs, because the people deploying them don't want to spend the money on redundancy and nobody forces them to.
I hope I *never* find out.
I am done with Windows as well, specifically because of all the bullshit licensing and the 30 different versions of Windows 7 and Office that exist now.  Microsoft has made it insanely inefficient to just install the damn operating system and run your apps.  I have been working with linux on the server side for going on 10 years, so now it is time to go to the desktop (well, laptop).
No, that's a fib.  A Jib is a tone of comment made with limited intellectual depth and is only superficially plausible. 
As far as I'm concerned, there are no ringtones on my cell phone.  I don't even know what they sound like.
For the children, I'd wager.
Brush my teeth  How mundane :[
The GOP is salivating at the passage of “Obamacare”, because it will be the political equivalent of a two by four with framing spikes pounded through. Not only have the Republicans got the kind of change they can believe in, they’re going to bash Democrats over the head with it for years to come.
&gt;The paper also shows how hilly territory affects the changes, because different micro climates are close. And so on.  That is useful information.  The overall average is not very useful.  
Murder has not been proven.  You don't have all the facts, but you think you're qualified to proclaim someone is a murderer?  Well, I know a few people who don't have all the facts and want to claim some people are terrorists.  I guess you won't have any argument with them though because you have no problem making judgments of others when you don't have all the facts.
Our population is definitely to blame, but it's not because we didn't riot when Bush was re-elected in 2004. Bush and Cheney won because they received the majority vote (both electoral college and popular). You can't stop believing in the democratic process when the majority opinion isn't the one with which you agree.
Don;t ask, don;t tell!!!!
Hey I heard that too. Maybe there really is something to those rumors.
Of course, none of this applies to the ass. 
OK, compromise: lets swap neighbors - you can have Scotland if we can have Canada? 
I think he meant "anis".
[lucero](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ugj4LKRGOzw)   [lucero's jawbreaker cover](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QvoGhi0DNj4&amp;feature=related)  
I must say that your ISP's company name leaves opportunity for marketing.  "Cox comes faster!" for example
I earned my way to a substantial scholarship to study music, I do what I must to feed myself because I do not have a leisurely budget each month, I practice and study as I must, and furthermore, I didn't buy a fucking thing on Black Friday. I worked for my GPA, which is a B+ average and not a piece of cake to keep, and I intend to go to graduate school immediately upon graduating.  I am not part of the problem.  Be more specific on who you are pointing your fingers towards. I care plenty, and blanket statements like "We don't give a fuck" do not make you sound profound.
You should always have a few backup job prospects when it comes time for your annual raise.  That way, you can play hardball and not have to worry about your bluff being called.
They need to apologize to each other. They clearly have other problems when they're both so willing to be shitty to one another.
If you call it judging to communicate a negative opinion on something another person enjoys, then judging each other is as I see it an inevitable part of getting to know each other. We judge, negotiate and compromise. Or break up if negotiations fail. 
Just to clear this up. The guitar is right handed. I play it so the Koopa is on its back (its been stomped). When it is on a guitar stand its walking about. Just pretend Mario jumped on the Koopa Troopa and chose to hold it for too long so its escaping.
In fact however, if you were to simply pull you head out of your ass, you would find out that there is no such thing as Global Warming, only Producer Hating.
Cats get injured very easily outdoors.  My cats kept getting fleas every year, so I stopped letting them out.  They're lucky they didn't end up dead though, honestly.  Indoor cats live longer statistically.
So, his complaints are:  * Different stack discipline than Linux. * System calls are prefixed with "_". * ...and that's it.  Yeah, not a compelling argument.
I think tomorrow we should make a poll in r/gaming between TF2 and Urban Terror, and also ask what causes we should donate to (I have a suspicion ACLU will win...)  We also need an IRC channel and a website.  I'll try to do some of that stuff tomorrow.... talk to you then.  Happy new years to you as well!
I don't think you understand.  They were made from the same die.
[Fix'd](http://i.imgur.com/27xuA.jpg)
Actually, total blue moon lunar eclipses almost always look [BLOOD RED](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/1/15/Lunar_Eclipse.jpg)
I used this all the time when I lived in Davis! It's a great resource.
Solution: Give her the old Sinead O'Connor while she's sleeping.
I humbly adore you. May the gods burn alive, hence brighten your muse.
you wont.
rofl my wife would totally buy it
I am non religous .  I do not see the point in this symbolism.  Some of the traditions and other legacies of religions are useful and are our cultural heritage.  If there is a logical reason to change the calender then maybe.
No I think my chubby is pretty!
&gt;No sequences there!  No, but an expression is being evaluated (the if expression).  Lazy evaluation is all about the evaluation of expressions lazily. jLinq does not do this.
My uncle purposely left his wallet empty, his car on empty, and his house empty of food on New Years Eve of 1999 just to mock all the idiots who thought the world was going to end.
You accidently the whole thing? 
Tea, herbal, hot.
 int main()  {   size_t alloc_size = 6LL * 1024LL * 1024LL * 1024LL;   void *addr = malloc(alloc_size);   printf("Address %p for %lld bytes\n", addr, alloc_size);    return 0;  }  Result:  Address 0x100200000 for 6442450944 bytes  No problem.
And a liar.
battle royale is one of my favorites as many others  what genre's do you like most?
I'm assuming she broke up with you?  Stop thinking about her.  Meet up with her.  Play it how it goes.
Mmmm, I bet you never had to enjoy a pilonidal cyst!
http://www.google.com/search?client=safari&amp;rls=en&amp;q=biggest+worldwide+day+of+protest&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=UTF-8
And just like the banking industry, when things become that large no single person or organization is responsible anymore.  Profits through the roof!  Accountability be damned!
I’ve seen it every year, and this year brought no surprises. People rushing around from one retail locale to the next. Searching for the lowest-priced thing of choice to wrap in thin, cheap paper to give to their loved one so they won’t be thought a scrooge.
Two examples of amazement and hilarity from our old friend Sir Isaac Newton!   1) The cat-door  2) Comedic conservation of momentum
Yes. I do.  White House staffers leak information to media outlets every day. We have thousands of professional journalists, and millions of bloggers who want nothing more than to break a huge story.  Conspiracy fans fail to take the above into account.  Incidentally, you have to be pretty paranoid and cynical to think that members of the US government, -who are after all, just regular citizens- are out to kill you.
I just watched gay sex scene and all I can say is: aww :3
how about this for a solution: do nothing. a guy put up a funny "downvote me" topic, we all did so.   no big deal. 
Yeah, but who likes going to the doctard?
.308, you do not need mildot as you will not be ranging at 1000 yards  just get a decent 9X scope
The original cotton eyed Joe.
deathcloud9 said:  Because they think only their top row shows when they smile... And that they're stupid. This is about correct.  These same people will want an easily restored back tooth extracted instead of restoring it, but will spend all their money saving a non-restorable front tooth.
I stand corrected. I concur.
"3 points 27 minutes ago" Holy shit, I'm in the future. Your joke is actually pretty funny. Wish you were here. XOXO Riley
That's not easy. There's only so much spectrum available to be used for wireless telephony and data services.  You cannot change the laws of physics.
A hypothetical universe has many qualities; there are universes where I am white, and where I am black, where I am tall, and where I am short, I can imagine all of these things, just as I can imagine universes where god is tall or god is short, where god looks like a human, or looks like an elephant. A description of god and demonstrating the existence of a specific god is very different than demonstrating the existence of a god.  Not only can I tell you firmly that god exists, because humans exist, and humans define the nature of the words they used, and we, or I more specifically have allowed the definition of god to include the abstract that which we cannot know but is more powerful than I and has some role in my creation, but also, I can show you that mathematically it is probabalistically much more likely for there to be some form of god than no god what-so-ever.  If you misunderstood my argument than fine, but I am not arguing that any one of your infinity of improbable things is true, all I am arguing is that taken as a whole, the likelihood of all of those improbable things, is greater than that of one other similarly improbable thing (no god). You give false value to your one improbable possible universe; all else being equal, and knowing nothing factual about the question of the existence of god, you give yourself a 50% chance of being true; a very narrow minded thing to do. I am merely pointing out an error in your domain — the question is not god or no god, the question is what is the nature, and the range of answers to this are infinite.  You bring Occam's Razor into it which is fitting, as I am merely applying that. When all our understanding of the universe suggests there is an X which we do not yet comprehend, why is nulling it to zero in line with the principle of Occam's Razor? it isnt.  I am not arguing for a specific hypothesis, or a specific theory; I am not an engineer and I will not profess a specificity until I have some inkling about what those specifics might be.  I don't need a theory or hypothesis about the nature of god to demonstrate that it is more likely that a god of some form exists. I am not inventing a god to explain things I don't understand, I am simply calling that which I don't understand god.  I have in fact presented quite a solid challenge to everything you have said.  I opened to rejoinder because there is in fact a valid one, you just haven't found it yet.  Happy New Year!
Grunge had some raw, dirty, badass sound. We were only missing it for 4 or 5 years.
**It's over 9000!**
you should! and i'll keep your /r/V-card safe, no worries :)
As a nihilist, I believe in nuss'ing.
&gt;Using functions as arguments gives you much more power.  There are several examples of passing in functions as arguments.
You haven't truly made a great video game until the court of law gets involved or you have a psychotic minority on your tail at all times.
I'm pretty sure hepatitis is a liver disease.
Because he posted it in MissingPersons!
Shit covered food sounds scary to anyone.
Thanks for the advice!
&gt;Paul advocates a major distinction between Christ (meaning the Holy Spirit, God in a better mood, or whatever else you want to come up with) and Jesus (the man who walked and talked and healed, etc.)  Do you mind pointing to a few refrences that indicate Paul made this distinction? And if Paul saw such a great distinction between the two, why does he combine the name "Jesus" with the title "Christ" so often, using them as equative nouns?
What is the right attitude to have toward technology? That is a great philosophical question.   I suppose a good start would be to oppose the practice of locking the user out of repairing and maintaining technical objects. People should be encouraged to learn about technology, take it apart, put it back together, modify it, take chances, make mistakes, and get messy.
It wasn't deceptive if you were paying attention. Maybe you were blinded by optimism. Obama, during his campaign:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bhYD8_L0nV8  &gt;This is the problem when you want to try to fix Washington is if you take certain steps to improve the process, then people will say it's not perfect. Well of course it's not perfect.
people who speak the truth are rarely listened to.   i upvoted you.  but i downvoted this post.
god loves you, [and he needs money.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MeSSwKffj9o)
should make that into a rage comic...
I think the instruments will cease to function before that happens.
Manly, cute:) hha
By "barely run it" I mean it is playable (20-30fps), but that's about it... Also, my card might be 512m (not sure).
I also hope everybody realizes that you're just as senile and dickish as the people trying to kick the child out.  You're lower than scum.
Glad to see you choose functionality over being trendy! 
The Loongson 3 will have a 4 core and 8 core.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loongson#Loongson_3
Also, it might've been a false positive by the dog.  So they took the guy in for questioning on suspicion that there could be a bomb, and then did a manual search of the bag. And maybe at that point they didn't actually find a bomb in the bag, but they did find something else illegal in there or maybe the guy revealed a crime during questioning.  Or maybe the guy was in cahoots with the bomber and there was some bomb residue on his bag, but not enough evidence to really come out and say that they were accomplices. That would explain him being "in custody" but not yet "under arrest".  &gt;Notice that this man was "being held" and not "arrested", which was a cute semantic ploy by the FBI to stretch the truth and not lie.   It's not a "cute semantic ploy" because the two statuses are very different things, with different investigation options constitutionally available to law enforcement, different standards that law enforcement has to meet in order to legally keep the guy, and different options the suspect has of challenging it.  And I didn't see anything from the author that would indicate that this was an arrest as opposed to some lesser detention, though it was written pretty badly so maybe I missed it.
You mean [this?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pMtpWFYRKvs#t=2m47s)  It was a joke from russell peters, I think.
You're such a pig
I had this jewelry box (read shitty cardboard box from the early 90's) that I've had since I was about 2 or 3 years old. My parents gave me a new one for Christmas this year and I'm having a hard time throwing out this old box which has its stickers peeling off of it, its completely faded and 3 of the 6 drawers are broken. I love it
heh, only if people cared enough that something in them would say "that's fucked up" otherwise it's just more apathy and contempt. :)
The irradiated shit is safe?  I'm tickled pink.
It isn't my personal life, it is the enormity of the crimes I hear about.  I agree with all your above points, with these qualifications: standards of living have gone up for some people, not all. Literacy rates have gone up because there are more people in the "pool". Do your stats take into account the huge increase in population we have had? Slaves were freed a long time ago, yet we barely pay illegals to do the grunt work now. And women can still vote. Actually my personal life is fine, thanks.  I just got a fairly large raise, I am reasonably happy with life, but I think we ALL need to look around us.  We need to come up for air, and see who is floating next to us.  Not everyone is doing as well as I am.  That is sad to me. There will always be a bell-shaped curve in life, but it's getting a little pointy at the top instead of round. 
8th
Wait...  There's a dinner for New Years?  No one told me this. I've been missing another excuse to pig out all these years...
I see what you did there, Tricky Dick.
And how do you justify that? Django is the only web framework I'm using professionally in the past 2+ years and I want to ask the same question.  When someone makes a statement like that it's expected from another to demand explanation. Other than the explanation being "Making a custom webapp in django is much faster than making it in any other framework and I only had x days/hours to do it, even more because I'm familiar with it" he may have some interesting insight to share. Especially in this case when he used the word possible specifically.
It's "cloud" in the sense that there are not a lot of local apps, the majority are Prism-based web apps. It has a repository of Prism apps, and is a nice social OS. Have you tried booting it on a netbook, or just in VM? On my netbook it booted much quicker than Eeebuntu.
Probably weren't using the Binford Irrigation System 5000.
This is why I only order online. I don't want to talk to them, they don't want to talk to me, I can mess around with my order however I like, and it works out perfectly.  Oh how I wish we'd had online ordering back in my day (Domino's, early to mid 90s). :)
I don't trust their *skull*duggery...
I fresh blade on a DE razor with **good technique** will give you a smooth shave no matter what color your skin is.
Not any of my work mates!
You will find alleviation of grief and anxiety. You will find a source of relief and consolation. It's real fuckin' hard. It'll seem distant and/or impossible. You'll probably want to give up. You won't give up. You will attain those pearls. 
LOL. Good find. As a former policy analyst I have constructed a small sketch to explain how this *probably* happened.  *(open scene on two wonked out, drugged up, Czech policy analysts)*  "Hey Grigor, y--y--you know what'd b-be REALLY COOL?" "W-what, maaaaan?" "We should *laugh-snort*... hehe... we should write a memo to our bosses telling them to decriminalize AAAALLL drugs." "N-no WAY MAN! They'll never go for it! LET'S TOTALLY DO IT." "D-dude, give ...me the pen."
I only keep Time Warner for broadband.  I pay $15/month (my building has a discount) for broadcast stations only and watch most of my shows via Hulu or Netflix.  Love it.  
These guys are doing a great job, especially ExtraLives.org founder Tim. It's a hard work to host something like this and they are getting more viewers and donators than they have ever had before, so considering this pressure he is doing great. The charity is not absolutely ideal, but they do good work and I think Tims future marathons will be a greater success.  This should be encouraged.
their finger nails/rip it out?
Not to mention the whole drug addict thing.
That cough scared the shit out of me.  It was so much louder than the rest of the audio.
If only I were gay...
Cmon... "Someone just stole my purse and iPhone on the subway"... "OK maam, were gonnna need you to come to the precinct an hour away and flip through a couple of mugshots of known criminals... an hour away from where the crime was commited."... Gimmie a break. Any city with a population greater than 50,000 would write a report and let you be on your way.
I know it makes sense to just get them from a library, but I really, *really* like owning the books that I read.  Maybe it's just sentimental attachment or...  I don't know.
Inaccurate. He did not wish him demise. He predicted he would die before a healthcare bill was passed. Not the same as wishing for his death.  Did you bother to read the article you linked to?
It turns out that the more arguments you muster against someone's point of view, the less effective you'll be, even if they're stronger arguments.  So rather than trying to rebut these claims one by one, just say one thing to the person who forwarded you the chain letter.  Secondly, if you make an assertive statement, they'll probably react by finding a counterargument, and it turns out that *that* is also counterproductive for you, because the more someone searches for arguments against you, the more convinced of their position they become, even if your points are stronger than theirs.  So, I recommend the one thing you say be an innocent question, rather than an assertive claim.  For example, you might respond: "What are Obama's anti-white writings?  I've never heard of any, so I find that statement strange.  Can you show me some of them?"
I know...   ;_;
It's not to late to change that you know :)
Unplug your cable box, attach rabbit ears, turn to channel 7.  Problem solved.  Signed,  No cable tv since 2004
Great documentary. Even conservative friends concede it was extremely well-done.   Guilty pleasure/favorite part?  When that d-bag college kid asks why the CIA isn't coming to kill Chomsky during some Q/A.
The only private tracker I'm is Baconbits which I assume you are as well. I have not looked at the library but I'm going to assume it does not have every movie in my collection so even if I DL alot at some point I will probably have to rip my own due to not locating or poor quality torrents.   No bandwith caps FiOS is great for DL many torrents at once while still gaming.   Question for you tho. How many movies have you DL and do you use any proxies or programs to protect yourself at all. Just curious because I use torrents almost entirely for software and those companies are not as lawsuit happy as the MPAA. 
My phone is currently in police evidence on vibrate. I once lost my cell at night by the highway on ramp. Since it was on it was fucking hard to find, now I always set it on a a simple ringtone in case I lose it again. 
Mmmmmmm
fat bastard better drop off, he is in my dead pool!
this was taken the day after halloween (I was a zombie army man)
I don't know if you count me and a 60 of Jack Daniels a solo night. I might end up having dual personalities before I call it a night. 
What is hypocritical is that in pointing what a frivolous argument some defunct Romney Spoksperson had you call him an "operative". WTF is that? Is he jumping around the bushes in a ski mask planting bombs and shit? Is he taking clandestine orders from some secret republican base at the base of some underwater mountain cobra commander would be jealous of? No, he's just some right wing nut with a 'tarded opinion. Oh but to a left wing nut he's an "operative".  Same crap coming form the blue team as from the red team.
I do not agree with Mr. Foer's tactics, but they are not terrorism. However, the ALF and PETA could be a bit more moderate. There have been more than a few activities that WERE assault and terrorism. In Oregon, they burnt down a Dodge dealer, a Forest Service building, and then released farmed mink, which promptly perished outside captivity. Middle ground, please? Prime rib for dins tonight!!
fun fact, scheduling is one of the (quite a few things) that can take a performance hit from having more cores/SMP, especially if you provide mechanisms to tweak it (e.g. CPU affinity). More isn't always better.  
Heh, where do you go to school?
I'm not trying to be a pain, but I didn't see any examples of what problems "drug tourists" actually cause.   I appreciate the context, though, as my only knowledge of the Netherlands is my only drug tour to Amsterdam after college. I think you answered my primary question, which was whether the tourism problem was related to economics or social issues.
i just bought this tv  http://www.amazon.com/NEC-MultiSync-LCD8205-display-widescreen/dp/B001H3KLTE/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;s=tv&amp;qid=1262289845&amp;sr=1-1
Good to know man :)  I do tend to get looks when I have it trimmed or fully grown. But my dad says I look like a basiji and I should shave it off asap!  It sucks having a beard and being persian, cause they automatically label you a muslim fanatic.   But I love my beard. DAMN IT LEAVE MY BEARD ALONE!
An ideal gift to Limbaugh would be a spliced recording of all the nastiest things he's ever said about anyone - played at full volume continuously.  It would be a blessing to have that putrid voice of circular logic out of the loop. Have a happy retirement Rush!
...Short story:  Sometime in 1969/1970, my grandparents purchased an H.H. Scott console.  In the following decades, they proceeded to use it happily at 5-10% volume, a few days out of every week-- until, finally, they gave it to their church.  The church just let it sit there for years.  The easiest thing to say is probably that I didn't even know that thing existed.  One day I guess I off-handedly mentioned to my Grandparents that I really wanted a record player...  When I walked into my bedroom that next fateful day, and saw what my simple request had bestowed upon me, I knew that I would never want another primary sound setup for the entire rest of my life.  [The turntable I have](http://i.audioscope.net/sonyx55.jpg) was already in the ['69 Scott Berkeley from my grandparents](http://farm3.static.flickr.com/2428/3728759630_576c106db3_o.jpg). The Berkeley, when I got it, was in perfect condition *but I've used it quite a lot since then*.  It's been in at least six different houses since I first got my hands on it, and I still have the original user's Manual in one full piece.  It's been through a lot since it met me, but I mean, I have plans to restore every aspect of that console when I can afford it in the future (I'm really not ever going to get rid of it.  Seriously.) So, I guess it's mostly for sentimental reasons, but I just can't imagine using a different turntable, because that PS-x55 has been doing a fine job for my family since the year it came out--  just like the stereo console that I got it in.
Your uncle sounds like someone I'd drink with.
Not long enough to become acquainted I guess.
The Aristocrats!
A New Orleans-style crawfish boil, with lobsters instead of crawfish, corn on the cob, new potatoes, Sam Adams Boston Ale, and andouille, then for dessert cheesecake from the Cheesecake Factory, and a dessert wine (not sure which yet, probably a moscato). 
Well that's even worse if he is mixing expression and argument syntax :(
Life is one fleeting moment. Grab this opportunity by the balls for FUCKS SAKE man, this might be a chance at happiness...dont let anything stop you   
I've have had several good experiences through OKC.  I think so long as you don't take it too seriously, you're in for a good time. 
A good rule when throwing together a curry is to use everything in your spice rack starting with C. Cumin, coriander, chili, cloves, cinnamon, cardamom, curry leaves, etc.
Hello man I love!
For some reason she was afraid the ring would identify her too much if someone saw the pics :\  Edit: [this one](http://i.imgur.com/ChhQal.jpg) shows it
damn, couldn't even make it through, just damn...
love the kinsey scale.  me, l love cock so much it would take a very special va-jay-jay to make me go gay.
I thoroughly enjoyed the Korean movie Oldboy. It's quite dark.
Irony: The use of words expressing something other than their literal intention. Irony frequently overlaps with sarcasm.
I hear this sentiment a lot, but I've always wondered: just what exactly is it that you believe that God did?  What was God's input into this whole process?  What differences are there between your beliefs and the findings of conventional science (or for that matter, straight creationism)?
Aah good point, I should have mentioned I'm Arcane.  Its currently the highest dps spec unless you have enormous amounts of crit instead of haste on your gear.  But I understand many people still play fire or frostfire because of personal preference.
The bf and I are having another couple over and we plan to play boardgames all night while drinking sparkling apple cider (they don't drink) with the Twilight Zone marathon on in the background. All of us got a ton of boardgames for Christmas so we're super excited to try them out. Just bought a whole bunch of snacky foods to eat.  We were invited to a drunken New Years party by our co-workers, but we much prefer partying like old people. 
I'm in Louisiana. Chances of a redditer being within 50 miles of my city: 1%. http://imgur.com/x7KZj 
No reason to buy Half-Life Source, it just has water-y water and better physics. Unless that's important to you.
Can you elaborate your position and its conflict?
I wonder what Bozarking's opinion of this is....
Then why the 4 down votes? No up votes for obama's own web site?
City of God
i did nothing i would consider exceedingly dumb this past year
The problem is that the government and the people are thought of as separate.
That's actually just a crack in the rocks that you can see the sky through
Let's review:  * I provided many examples of the stupid things belief in a deity which has never been proven real will lead people to do and you have not refuted a single one.   * You claim it is stupid for me to state I am atheist because you choose to think that just because you can't read my mind that there's a chance I am not.  Not only is your claim based on ridiculous conjecture, it has nothing to do with the fact that no "god" described by humans has **EVER** been proven to be real.  I am **atheist**.  I am 100% certain no "god" described by humans exists.  While there's a slim chance there may be a being humans would call a "god," the fact that such a thing has never been shown to exist gives me no cause to define myself as anything BUT atheist.  Besides, when people want to know if someone is atheist, they don't ask, "Do you believe in a god which has never been described by humans but might exist?"  You'll take it on FAITH (a concept hijacked by religious adherents and put to use for muddling the minds of the easily led) that a "god" exists without being shown one bit of convincing evidence, but you'll claim a real person (me) with real thoughts &amp; a history of expression just *can't* be atheist without you being hooked directly to my brain in order to make sure.  You are wasting my time with fucking nonsense.  You go ahead and capitalize the word "god."  However, unless one is proven to be real, I will choose not to do so.  I will also encourage those with the ability to think more rationally than you to do the same as I.  ---  P.S. Can you prove you did not murder three male teenagers then sodomize their corpses this year?  I'm sure you can claim you're innocent of any such deed, but if you cannot prove it I must assume you are guilty and call you stupid for trying to profess non-guilt with mere words. There is a chance you only THINK you are innocent.
Racing during provincials - Aug/09: bonked halfway through the race but decided to keep the pace up. Took a corner too wide and ate hiway shoulder pretty bad. It was quite a retarded crash; I was by myself and simply lost concentration.  One before that in my first road race - May/09: 3rd lap, hanging in with the rest of the pack and finally raced to the front. Was preparing to jump off the front with 4 other guys from my team when my front wheel side swiped my teammates rear wheel. Went down real hard at ~40km/h, slid along the pavement and took out 4 guys (one with a broken arm, the others were OK). My bike was completely trashed. It was really hard getting back on (not to mention that I had to find another ride), but I am glad that I did.  (EDIT formatting)
don't tell me that =(
Gesundheit. Sounded phlegmy...
Well here in Northern Minnesota it is going to be -30F tonight so all you have to do is open the windows and it will be plenty cold. You won't even need to start the engine. So I'd say air conditioning is unnecessary. 
And the guys say "let the downvotes begin!"
What do you have to lose? Go on...you know you want to :)
I really like Ashton's suspenders in the movie Spread.  http://newsblaze.com/pix/2009/0813/pix/Spread-Movie-.jpg Super styly. 
got 8 parking tickets in two weeks got thrown in the drunk tank
I know that. My point is that Ambush could simply be considered to be errataed in the same vein as the portal cards.
There's something about having an outside perspective that seems to be one of the most helpful aspects of working with a therapist. That's what I would recommend, in any case.  Your worries about the expense, and the comfort level, are common (and understandable!) concerns. If you have insurance, therapy may be covered in full or in part. If you don't have insurance, you can google the city you are in and "free or low cost mental health" to see if you can find free or sliding-scale services in your area. If you are in college, your university probably has a counseling center where services are usually free. No one is comfortable the first time they go see a therapist. It's *weird* going to talk to someone you don't know about your problems.  But, therapists are trained in ways that should make it more comfortable to you. And, although you shouldn't expect to feel comfortable right away, if you go for the first meeting or so and don't feel like you could envision yourself *ever* becoming comfortable with that person, then you don't have to go back to them.  In fact, you could even tell them (or, often, even email them if telling them seems too confrontational for you), that you feel like you and that person are not the best match. You could even ask them to refer you to someone else who is more of what you are looking for (e.g., has more experience with your specific issue(s), is your same gender/ethnicity, is the therapeutic orientation you are looking for). They won't take it personally - no one can be the "right" therapist for everyone. 
You ought to look into the chemical differences between pastured beef and corn-fed beef.  You'd think twice about assuming it is as or more healthy.  Also, the predator analogy has no basis in this unnatural situation.
25th
Ugh.  That graphic proves that Titanic was the endless brown turd that crushed the winter of 1998 under its sappy weight. Edit: bite me, downvoting titanic fan.
I would say cutting off a penis you meant to circumsize is more than just a cursory mistake. 
[Cock race](http://www.sanjuanislander.com/images/fair/2001/events/races/chicken_race07.jpg)  (That one's really SFW, even if you're not in the adult entertainment business or British)
Because they should be.  A group of people should be perfectly able to draw up additional rules for the conducting of their lives with contractually-specified consequences for misbehavior.  
Although your asset allocation seems pretty well diversified and highly adaptive, I wonder what your Sharpe ratios are looking like. I know you're going for yield, but I'd like to see how your portfolio stacks up against the market line.   Also, I think you can play the market a little with a little help from FF3. For instance, you've segmented the market intuitively, which implies differentiation, so what about their betas? Obviously trolls are going to produce high volatility, but let's also consider high covariance with being new users and with helpful posters (probably highly attractive troll-targets). Now you see that you can get some meaningful betas out of constructing your own variables and regressing the market on them.  This also indicates that around 45% of your portfolio is subjected to more idiosyncratic risk than you thought (5% trolls plus 20% + 20% helpful posters with high covariance). I would really want to see what kind of loadings yield meaningful betas, then do asset allocation based on them. 
Wait... so you're saying that you can access reddit from home?
I'm not going to come and here and act all self-righteous, and pretend like I'm any better. But that dog was sick for a long time. It would've died very soon. Your wife made a tough fucking choice, one that you couldn't do yourself. That thing was probably in pain everyday. Keeping it around would be selfish. So, she took it to the vet, and after an evaluation from the vet, she reluctantly decided to put it down. (You know, they don't just kill dogs for no reason unless absolutely necessary.) You would divorce your wife for that? You're clearly off your rocker. You selfishly wanted to keep it around while it suffered. She swallowed a bullet and made the right choice. What more do you want? Don't be an idiot.
Online dating is bunk, at least from my experience. I was on POF, OKQ and Yahoo for about 6 months and never met a girl in person. I only got replies on 10% of the messages I sent, the rest were either read without reply or deleted entirely. My friends had the same experience, it's very frustrating.  Just understand that there are many more girls than guys dating online. It means they get to be extra picky. Temper your expectations, my friend. 
According to the OP all she heard was yelling, she didn't see or hear any actual violence. To then call the cops about domestic violence, as opposed to simply reporting the yelling or hearing a verbal dispute, you *are* advocating a false report. 
I'm pretty sure I was with my dad, drinking that sparkling grape juice stuff, doing the same things I do now. I was only 6, and I was more excited about turning 7 in 10 days than anything else... And I didn't even know what Y2K was, so I wasn't worried. 
That or "The Man from Earth".  It has deconverted at least one person I know of simply by provoking thought.
If you're worried about the assholes bugging you you could just turn off your phone.
Yeah, people don't understand that God wanted Rush to have a heart attack. Maybe that would stop the errors of his ways of lies and deception for money.  It could also be because he is extremely over weight, hates the liberals so much, is not physically active, probably eats unhealthy which contributes to his weight problem, and used to abuse drugs.   But in retrospect, it's easier to say that God wanted him to get a heart attack. I mean, why else would he have one? Is there any difference for people praying for him to get better? How could God make him better if he was the same being that instated the injury? It's like me shooting you in the foot and saying, I'll fix that right up for you! 
i don't think you understand how genetics work...
Kafkaesque would be the appropriate usage. 
Opt In Email Marketing,Targeted Opt In Email,
Happy New Year y'all!
Paul was certainly an idealist. 
Where in my comment did I count anything?
Breasts.  But as in helleborus' case, it's my brains he *really* can't resist.
You get more down votes then even I so why keep trying?
So you are planning to live another year in the "aughts" then?  Enjoy.
wow...amazed, that you guys are fighting each other now. I didnt expect that kind of a racist outlook from an Indian against another Indian.
Dizi Sinema Komedi Eğlence Magazin Muzik Klip Radyo Tv Dahasi Www.Yurdumuz.Com Da İzlenir..
Once Apple is notified of the theft....whether or not a police report is file. they are trafficking in stolen property with knowledge that it was stolen. OP should file SC court for return of the phone from Apple. Ask for discovery concerning the thief and once Apples legal department has to gear up she will get the phone back. At the same time file a complaint with the police that Apple is dealing in stolen property and ask that a detective be assigned to the case. After a letter comes to Apple concerning a criminal investigation where they are named a suspect, the problem will be rectified pretty quickly. Hitting them with civil and criminal complaints will get their attention pretty damn fast. And BTW the judge cannot dismiss the complaints due to the fact there are bonifide reasons to proceed with both.
&gt; If you're going to any bar/club solely to meet women, your experience will always be bad, no matter what   (Paraphrased and stolen from a comedian, but...)  You wouldn't get drunk and/or fucked up on drugs and go out to buy a washing machine, or a toaster. Why on Earth would you do the same to find a woman at a club?
You too! Enjoy this New Year!
So small that when they opened the frozen containers it reeked of it?  Bleh!
You could say that, but karma per post averages would actually be a better indication of how insightful comments are, rather than if you are a power user or long term user.
If you don't know what you want, park and go inside.  Now, look, I know there's two minds on this... Many people agree with me, and many people feel it doesn't hurt to decide what they want at the speaker... so I realize this, and I'm not *actually* demanding that you do this. Besides, what are the chances I'd find myself behind you in a drive-through?  But this is what I do. If I don't know what I want, I park and go inside, where I can look at the menu at my leisure. And I judge the line - if there is one - can I make up my mind before I get to the counter? If not, I hold back for a minute...
haha no never, not meth...
That font made my eyes scream.
It's not that the retirees are assholes *per se,* but most of them worked hard for several decades and in their old age have the mentality that they've paid their dues and want to be rewarded with an environment that corresponds to their years-in-the-making mental picture of what "the good life" is.  For most of them, that picture obviously does not include things like schools and kids.
And I see only one of you is currently married
Correct. He even got the "myriad of" right, just like "dozen of reasons" or "phalanx of reasons." It's a unit of measure and is used the same way.
Uh I really don't mean to give you excessive "don't get crazy" stuff, but being on a busy street where people throw firecrackers around carelessly would not really give me a good time on shrooms... (Not saying you were planning to go to a busy street; just mentioning it as something to consider)
I'm curious: have you read any books along the lines of How We Think or The Blank Slate, or any other books on sociobiology or the science of human nature?  I don't think libertarianism takes human nature into account sufficiently.  
I just finished reading "The Moral Animal" by Robert Wright. Near the end, after all but giving up on the idea of morality, he launches into an argument for utilitarianism. His premise is that humans have evolved mental organs for selfish reciprocal-altruism as well as mental organs for seeking social status through the appearance of doing good, and that these organs can be hijacked to support a happiness maximizing morality.   It's a good book, both for those interested in Darwinism in general and those interested in reading about a theory which purports to explain the basis of human nature.  Edit- To answer the question of why should you accept this moral structure in the first place, Wright answers that in some ways evolution has left us little choice. Though the above mentioned mental faculties evolved from a purely selfish (from the gene's perspective) motivation, it has given us the tools and motivation necessary to act in ways that are beneficial to our kin, our friends, and our countries. Extending this into a moral code is just an attempt to stretch these faculties to cover more people, ideally all of humanity. Why should we extend these natural proclivities for doing good to others? Because we can profit from it ourselves. Small actions on our part (like not killing our neighbors) can lead to rewards that help us (like being invited to their New Year's eve party). It seems that a perverted version of the golden rule is baked right into our DNA, so why not maximize its benefits?
During the inquisition, the Catholic church demanded the death of anyone who converted from Catholicism back to their original religion (after a forced conversion) or who simply converted.  The inquisition required the death be bloodless so thousands were burned to death.
&gt;mean that in the kindest possible way.   No one talks about Ron Paul that way! *punch in eye*
Sure.  It's not like radiation 'sticks' (contrary to popular mythology).  Being exposed to radiation doesn't make you radioactive.  The only way for something to become radioactive is if radioactive compounds get on it / in it.  So long as the meat is properly shielded from the radioactive source, the process should be perfectly safe.  
Yeah, people are just ignorant sheep that automatically do whatever society tells them.  But you're not, right?
this reminds me of [Apartment 26](http://listen.grooveshark.com/#/song/Give+Me+More/4254505) meets [nightwish](http://listen.grooveshark.com/#/song/Amaranth/7323110) 
Not trying to be condescending here, but how did you graduate with a CS degree without taking statistics? Did you also skip differential equations and multivariable calculus?  I'll note that I currently work for a hedge fund doing machine learning research and development. I graduated with an MS in CS (focused mostly on software engineering) and had more or less forgotten most of my statistics background. Fortunately, I knew my boss personally and he is a very patient guy who doesn't mind teaching. I started working, I've refreshed my mind of all the above mentioned subject matter and the concepts stick better now that I use them frequently.  I would say your task determines how much knowledge you need. If you just have a variation on a textbook problem, like getting a neural network to drive a car for example, then you can probably just mimic how other people did things and muddle through. If you want to apply algorithms to solve very challenging and/or novel problems, you need a more in-depth understanding of how these things work; that means you need some basic statistics knowledge and a decent amount of personal time investment. If your goal is to push the boundaries of general ML research and create your own novel algorithms that are better than the state of the art, you'll need to know a lot of statistics and math.
After you finish your PhD, what kind of a job can/will you get?
Sometimes there are people who necessitate that you turn your back on them, and then there are those that you have to give up in order to be sane.
&gt; I keep it on the DL so as not to hurt my parents/grandparents and to avoid the shitstorm that would ensue.  I'd say you're better off that way.
That is how it should be...
We have some relatives that live over there already so they helped to us get connected to the hospital over there, can't remember off the top of my head the name, I'll ask him next time I see him. The hospital was part of a group that arranged for literally everything, from flight to doctors. My brother was able to speak to a doctor before he went there and the hospital had tons of credentials and background.
23rd
&gt; If you live in the suburbs, you're the problem.  Grow some of your own food, don't use pesticides, put some solar panels on your roof, maybe take public transportation to work or telecommute, and this ain't necessarily so.
My Grandma was a stenographer and she said it was the most difficult job she's ever had. She kept at it until she got arthritis then she became a typing teacher.
Oh, it's not a solution. Just a hope and a dream.   My Windows XP PC (and WinME, iMac, and many more before that) never had sufficient power to index the files, either using Microsoft's/Apple's own built in software, or a third party's (I tried both). Even leaving the machines on and only idling for days. So I've always had to use the rudimentary basic OS search for them, which means it's extremely difficult and time-consuming to accomplish anything. I keep trying to take this mountain of data with me whenever I switch computers, hoping I'll someday have a machine capable of truly searching it in a practical manner. But it's been many years now, and the platforms don't seem to be improving in this regard. I HAVE created some substantial research compilations from this info despite the difficulties, and posted them online. But if I could have a truly practical search function, I'd accomplish a lot more, I'm sure.
might I ask what a well-manicured hand is doing in your shirt?
Yeah it's pretty lame.  It just seems like AT&amp;T is kind of being a cry baby.  I have an iPhone in San Francisco, and while the coverage and service sucks, it's still good enough to use and I'm not complaining too much.
I admire that mature response and I do agree it is a good idea.  I am, however, am impatient and willing to risk it.  I hope he flatlines.
What you just said does nothing to explain WHY the pain and suffering is necessary.   You say we will view it as being minor in hindsight.  You also choose the convenient pain and suffering of childbirth which is temporary and yields potentially a lifetime of joy, if you can even call childbirth pain and suffering to begin with.  What about the unnecessary pain and suffering of a half decade of cancer followed by death?  What about the pain and suffering of living in a war-zone or amidst a genocide.  Why AIDS, ever, for any reason?  Comparing childbirth to actual pain and suffering is naïve and completely insulting to those who actually suffer.  Give your "can't have some of the clothes they think are cool" speech to a starving child and see how much comfort it provides.  SOME of the cool clothes!? SOME!? How about no cool clothes.  How about no food or clothes at all?  I know you were just making a metaphor, but the terms you used highlight an insultingly sheltered concept of pain and suffering and sacrifice.  The sermon you just provided was about as philosophically empty and ignorant to the realities of life as anything I've ever heard come out of a white pastor's mouth back when I lived in Missouri.  Sorry if I sound harsh, but I find your apologetics and examples to be insulting to the concepts of pain and suffering.  Childbirth is a joy.  Clothes are a privilege.  Being upset about not having cool clothes is reprehensible behavior, not suffering, and should not have even been used in metaphor.  Despite how well what you said may have sounded within the range of suffering you have experienced in your life, and the conclusion that it gives you perspective; I doubt a starved infant corpse in Africa will have appreciated that it gained perspective.  The fact that you bothered to write anything you wrote above hints that you actually have limited perspective.   Everything you said also hinges on the concept that your memories and personality will somehow outlast your material brain, which should be patently absurd to any modern adult; and if you don't see why, then there is no point in discussing this further with you.  Which I don't plan on doing anyway, since what you said only makes sense if pain is temporary and minor, a magical place exists where you will be happy after you die.   I apologize if you are in fact a starving child in africa who has AIDS and is possibly missing limbs to the sting of a machete blade.  In which case I thank you for writing your comment in such a way as to appeal to this middle class audience which has no concept of what you go through as they read this on their computers with their full bellies in their comfortable homes with their cool clothes.  For your sake, I hope that the bronze age concept of a sky wizard in the clouds is more than just a wish for a light at the end of the tunnel.  Regardless, I'm sure the context you used will make them feel warm and fuzzy.
drink lots of alcohol, it kills stuff.   dont sleep, as sleep decreases nonpathogenic bacteria.   try to eat more of the same pie. As they say, "fight fire with fire".   definitely dont miss celebrating new years. 
[Relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UXUfEru-tqQ).
He cant.  It was the correct ruling.
Very Bad Things FTW
15 seconds is probably okay. More like a minute+ (as OP said) is probably enough to go inside. :)
They don't have enough hammer-ons.
7th!
30th
I read it in her voice. What have you done.
Kinda. I happened to have some guns with me, so that made controlling the populace much easier, until I ran into the Atlantians. They had some kinda cosmic death ray, and long story short, the incident that led me back to my own time also led to their nation sinking beneath the waves. My bad. And I ran into Jesus while he was kicking around India in his 20s. Pretty mellow dude. Smelly though. 
...just to show that he trafican!
There are two other numbers that you should also consider.  1. Number of successful entrepreneurs that *did not* drop out of school. 1. Number of people who dropped out thinking they were fucking hot shots, only to fail horribly.  You *only* hear about the ones that succeeded. Trust me, these are an extremely small minority.
Toady has been possessed (By H1N1)! 
I did a ~300 mile trip from Wisconsin to Michigan in cargo shorts and jeans, not much discomfort at all. I think it has to do with the fact that I ride every day in jeans and only use biking shorts for races, it keeps me from getting acclimated to them.
